Th Projct Gutnbrg Book of Alic’s Advnturs in Wondrland, by Lwis Carroll

This Book is for th us of anyon anywhr in th Unitd Stats and
most othr parts of th world at no cost and with almost no rstrictions
whatsovr. You may copy it, giv it away or r-us it undr th trms
of th Projct Gutnbrg Licns includd with this Book or onlin at
www.gutnbrg.org. If you ar not locatd in th Unitd Stats, you
will hav to chck th laws of th country whr you ar locatd bfor
using this Book.

Titl: Alic’s Advnturs in Wondrland

Author: Lwis Carroll

Rlas Dat: January, 1991 [Book #11]
[Most rcntly updatd: Octobr 12, 2020]

Languag: English

Charactr st ncoding: UTF-8

Producd by: Arthur DiBianca and David Widgr

*** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK ALICE’S ADVENTURES IN WONDERLAND ***

[Illustration]




Alic’s Advnturs in Wondrland

by Lwis Carroll

THE MILLENNIUM FULCRUM EDITION 3.0

Contnts

 CHAPTER I.     Down th Rabbit-Hol
 CHAPTER II.    Th Pool of Tars
 CHAPTER III.   A Caucus-Rac and a Long Tal
 CHAPTER IV.    Th Rabbit Snds in a Littl Bill
 CHAPTER V.     Advic from a Catrpillar
 CHAPTER VI.    Pig and Pppr
 CHAPTER VII.   A Mad Ta-Party
 CHAPTER VIII.  Th Qun’s Croqut-Ground
 CHAPTER IX.    Th Mock Turtl’s Story
 CHAPTER X.     Th Lobstr Quadrill
 CHAPTER XI.    Who Stol th Tarts?
 CHAPTER XII.   Alic’s Evidnc




CHAPTER I.
Down th Rabbit-Hol


Alic was bginning to gt vry tird of sitting by hr sistr on th
bank, and of having nothing to do: onc or twic sh had ppd into
th book hr sistr was rading, but it had no picturs or
convrsations in it, “and what is th us of a book,” thought Alic
“without picturs or convrsations?”

So sh was considring in hr own mind (as wll as sh could, for th
hot day mad hr fl vry slpy and stupid), whthr th plasur of
making a daisy-chain would b worth th troubl of gtting up and
picking th daisis, whn suddnly a Whit Rabbit with pink ys ran
clos by hr.

Thr was nothing so _vry_ rmarkabl in that; nor did Alic think it
so _vry_ much out of th way to har th Rabbit say to itslf, “Oh
dar! Oh dar! I shall b lat!” (whn sh thought it ovr aftrwards,
it occurrd to hr that sh ought to hav wondrd at this, but at th
tim it all smd quit natural); but whn th Rabbit actually _took a
watch out of its waistcoat-pockt_, and lookd at it, and thn hurrid
on, Alic startd to hr ft, for it flashd across hr mind that sh
had nvr bfor sn a rabbit with ithr a waistcoat-pockt, or a
watch to tak out of it, and burning with curiosity, sh ran across th
fild aftr it, and fortunatly was just in tim to s it pop down a
larg rabbit-hol undr th hdg.

In anothr momnt down wnt Alic aftr it, nvr onc considring how
in th world sh was to gt out again.

Th rabbit-hol wnt straight on lik a tunnl for som way, and thn
dippd suddnly down, so suddnly that Alic had not a momnt to think
about stopping hrslf bfor sh found hrslf falling down a vry
dp wll.

Eithr th wll was vry dp, or sh fll vry slowly, for sh had
plnty of tim as sh wnt down to look about hr and to wondr what
was going to happn nxt. First, sh trid to look down and mak out
what sh was coming to, but it was too dark to s anything; thn sh
lookd at th sids of th wll, and noticd that thy wr filld with
cupboards and book-shlvs; hr and thr sh saw maps and picturs
hung upon pgs. Sh took down a jar from on of th shlvs as sh
passd; it was lablld “ORANGE MARMALADE”, but to hr grat
disappointmnt it was mpty: sh did not lik to drop th jar for far
of killing sombody undrnath, so managd to put it into on of th
cupboards as sh fll past it.

“Wll!” thought Alic to hrslf, “aftr such a fall as this, I shall
think nothing of tumbling down stairs! How brav thy’ll all think m
at hom! Why, I wouldn’t say anything about it, vn if I fll off th
top of th hous!” (Which was vry likly tru.)

Down, down, down. Would th fall _nvr_ com to an nd? “I wondr how
many mils I’v falln by this tim?” sh said aloud. “I must b
gtting somwhr nar th cntr of th arth. Lt m s: that would
b four thousand mils down, I think—” (for, you s, Alic had larnt
svral things of this sort in hr lssons in th schoolroom, and
though this was not a _vry_ good opportunity for showing off hr
knowldg, as thr was no on to listn to hr, still it was good
practic to say it ovr) “—ys, that’s about th right distanc—but
thn I wondr what Latitud or Longitud I’v got to?” (Alic had no
ida what Latitud was, or Longitud ithr, but thought thy wr nic
grand words to say.)

Prsntly sh bgan again. “I wondr if I shall fall right _through_
th arth! How funny it’ll sm to com out among th popl that walk
with thir hads downward! Th Antipathis, I think—” (sh was rathr
glad thr _was_ no on listning, this tim, as it didn’t sound at all
th right word) “—but I shall hav to ask thm what th nam of th
country is, you know. Plas, Ma’am, is this Nw Zaland or Australia?”
(and sh trid to curtsy as sh spok—fancy _curtsying_ as you’r
falling through th air! Do you think you could manag it?) “And what
an ignorant littl girl sh’ll think m for asking! No, it’ll nvr do
to ask: prhaps I shall s it writtn up somwhr.”

Down, down, down. Thr was nothing ls to do, so Alic soon bgan
talking again. “Dinah’ll miss m vry much to-night, I should think!”
(Dinah was th cat.) “I hop thy’ll rmmbr hr saucr of milk at
ta-tim. Dinah my dar! I wish you wr down hr with m! Thr ar
no mic in th air, I’m afraid, but you might catch a bat, and that’s
vry lik a mous, you know. But do cats at bats, I wondr?” And hr
Alic bgan to gt rathr slpy, and wnt on saying to hrslf, in a
dramy sort of way, “Do cats at bats? Do cats at bats?” and
somtims, “Do bats at cats?” for, you s, as sh couldn’t answr
ithr qustion, it didn’t much mattr which way sh put it. Sh flt
that sh was dozing off, and had just bgun to dram that sh was
walking hand in hand with Dinah, and saying to hr vry arnstly,
“Now, Dinah, tll m th truth: did you vr at a bat?” whn suddnly,
thump! thump! down sh cam upon a hap of sticks and dry lavs, and
th fall was ovr.

Alic was not a bit hurt, and sh jumpd up on to hr ft in a momnt:
sh lookd up, but it was all dark ovrhad; bfor hr was anothr
long passag, and th Whit Rabbit was still in sight, hurrying down
it. Thr was not a momnt to b lost: away wnt Alic lik th wind,
and was just in tim to har it say, as it turnd a cornr, “Oh my ars
and whiskrs, how lat it’s gtting!” Sh was clos bhind it whn sh
turnd th cornr, but th Rabbit was no longr to b sn: sh found
hrslf in a long, low hall, which was lit up by a row of lamps hanging
from th roof.

Thr wr doors all round th hall, but thy wr all lockd; and whn
Alic had bn all th way down on sid and up th othr, trying vry
door, sh walkd sadly down th middl, wondring how sh was vr to
gt out again.

Suddnly sh cam upon a littl thr-lggd tabl, all mad of solid
glass; thr was nothing on it xcpt a tiny goldn ky, and Alic’s
first thought was that it might blong to on of th doors of th hall;
but, alas! ithr th locks wr too larg, or th ky was too small,
but at any rat it would not opn any of thm. Howvr, on th scond
tim round, sh cam upon a low curtain sh had not noticd bfor, and
bhind it was a littl door about fiftn inchs high: sh trid th
littl goldn ky in th lock, and to hr grat dlight it fittd!

Alic opnd th door and found that it ld into a small passag, not
much largr than a rat-hol: sh knlt down and lookd along th
passag into th lovlist gardn you vr saw. How sh longd to gt
out of that dark hall, and wandr about among thos bds of bright
flowrs and thos cool fountains, but sh could not vn gt hr had
through th doorway; “and vn if my had would go through,” thought
poor Alic, “it would b of vry littl us without my shouldrs. Oh,
how I wish I could shut up lik a tlscop! I think I could, if I only
knw how to bgin.” For, you s, so many out-of-th-way things had
happnd latly, that Alic had bgun to think that vry fw things
indd wr rally impossibl.

Thr smd to b no us in waiting by th littl door, so sh wnt
back to th tabl, half hoping sh might find anothr ky on it, or at
any rat a book of ruls for shutting popl up lik tlscops: this
tim sh found a littl bottl on it, (“which crtainly was not hr
bfor,” said Alic,) and round th nck of th bottl was a papr
labl, with th words “DRINK ME,” bautifully printd on it in larg
lttrs.

It was all vry wll to say “Drink m,” but th wis littl Alic was
not going to do _that_ in a hurry. “No, I’ll look first,” sh said,
“and s whthr it’s markd ‘_poison_’ or not”; for sh had rad
svral nic littl historis about childrn who had got burnt, and
atn up by wild basts and othr unplasant things, all bcaus thy
_would_ not rmmbr th simpl ruls thir frinds had taught thm:
such as, that a rd-hot pokr will burn you if you hold it too long;
and that if you cut your fingr _vry_ dply with a knif, it usually
blds; and sh had nvr forgottn that, if you drink much from a
bottl markd “poison,” it is almost crtain to disagr with you,
soonr or latr.

Howvr, this bottl was _not_ markd “poison,” so Alic vnturd to
tast it, and finding it vry nic, (it had, in fact, a sort of mixd
flavour of chrry-tart, custard, pin-appl, roast turky, toff, and
hot buttrd toast,) sh vry soon finishd it off.

*      *      *      *      *      *      *

    *      *      *      *      *      *

*      *      *      *      *      *      *


“What a curious fling!” said Alic; “I must b shutting up lik a
tlscop.”

And so it was indd: sh was now only tn inchs high, and hr fac
brightnd up at th thought that sh was now th right siz for going
through th littl door into that lovly gardn. First, howvr, sh
waitd for a fw minuts to s if sh was going to shrink any furthr:
sh flt a littl nrvous about this; “for it might nd, you know,”
said Alic to hrslf, “in my going out altogthr, lik a candl. I
wondr what I should b lik thn?” And sh trid to fancy what th
flam of a candl is lik aftr th candl is blown out, for sh could
not rmmbr vr having sn such a thing.

Aftr a whil, finding that nothing mor happnd, sh dcidd on going
into th gardn at onc; but, alas for poor Alic! whn sh got to th
door, sh found sh had forgottn th littl goldn ky, and whn sh
wnt back to th tabl for it, sh found sh could not possibly rach
it: sh could s it quit plainly through th glass, and sh trid hr
bst to climb up on of th lgs of th tabl, but it was too slippry;
and whn sh had tird hrslf out with trying, th poor littl thing
sat down and crid.

“Com, thr’s no us in crying lik that!” said Alic to hrslf,
rathr sharply; “I advis you to lav off this minut!” Sh gnrally
gav hrslf vry good advic, (though sh vry sldom followd it),
and somtims sh scoldd hrslf so svrly as to bring tars into
hr ys; and onc sh rmmbrd trying to box hr own ars for having
chatd hrslf in a gam of croqut sh was playing against hrslf,
for this curious child was vry fond of prtnding to b two popl.
“But it’s no us now,” thought poor Alic, “to prtnd to b two
popl! Why, thr’s hardly nough of m lft to mak _on_ rspctabl
prson!”

Soon hr y fll on a littl glass box that was lying undr th tabl:
sh opnd it, and found in it a vry small cak, on which th words
“EAT ME” wr bautifully markd in currants. “Wll, I’ll at it,” said
Alic, “and if it maks m grow largr, I can rach th ky; and if it
maks m grow smallr, I can crp undr th door; so ithr way I’ll
gt into th gardn, and I don’t car which happns!”

Sh at a littl bit, and said anxiously to hrslf, “Which way? Which
way?”, holding hr hand on th top of hr had to fl which way it was
growing, and sh was quit surprisd to find that sh rmaind th sam
siz: to b sur, this gnrally happns whn on ats cak, but Alic
had got so much into th way of xpcting nothing but out-of-th-way
things to happn, that it smd quit dull and stupid for lif to go
on in th common way.

So sh st to work, and vry soon finishd off th cak.

*      *      *      *      *      *      *

    *      *      *      *      *      *

*      *      *      *      *      *      *




CHAPTER II.
Th Pool of Tars


“Curiousr and curiousr!” crid Alic (sh was so much surprisd, that
for th momnt sh quit forgot how to spak good English); “now I’m
opning out lik th largst tlscop that vr was! Good-by, ft!”
(for whn sh lookd down at hr ft, thy smd to b almost out of
sight, thy wr gtting so far off). “Oh, my poor littl ft, I
wondr who will put on your shos and stockings for you now, dars? I’m
sur _I_ shan’t b abl! I shall b a grat dal too far off to troubl
myslf about you: you must manag th bst way you can;—but I must b
kind to thm,” thought Alic, “or prhaps thy won’t walk th way I
want to go! Lt m s: I’ll giv thm a nw pair of boots vry
Christmas.”

And sh wnt on planning to hrslf how sh would manag it. “Thy must
go by th carrir,” sh thought; “and how funny it’ll sm, snding
prsnts to on’s own ft! And how odd th dirctions will look!

     _Alic’s Right Foot, Esq., Harthrug, nar th Fndr,_ (_with
     Alic’s lov_).

Oh dar, what nonsns I’m talking!”

Just thn hr had struck against th roof of th hall: in fact sh was
now mor than nin ft high, and sh at onc took up th littl goldn
ky and hurrid off to th gardn door.

Poor Alic! It was as much as sh could do, lying down on on sid, to
look through into th gardn with on y; but to gt through was mor
hoplss than vr: sh sat down and bgan to cry again.

“You ought to b ashamd of yourslf,” said Alic, “a grat girl lik
you,” (sh might wll say this), “to go on crying in this way! Stop
this momnt, I tll you!” But sh wnt on all th sam, shdding
gallons of tars, until thr was a larg pool all round hr, about
four inchs dp and raching half down th hall.

Aftr a tim sh hard a littl pattring of ft in th distanc, and
sh hastily drid hr ys to s what was coming. It was th Whit
Rabbit rturning, splndidly drssd, with a pair of whit kid glovs
in on hand and a larg fan in th othr: h cam trotting along in a
grat hurry, muttring to himslf as h cam, “Oh! th Duchss, th
Duchss! Oh! won’t sh b savag if I’v kpt hr waiting!” Alic flt
so dsprat that sh was rady to ask hlp of any on; so, whn th
Rabbit cam nar hr, sh bgan, in a low, timid voic, “If you plas,
sir—” Th Rabbit startd violntly, droppd th whit kid glovs and
th fan, and skurrid away into th darknss as hard as h could go.

Alic took up th fan and glovs, and, as th hall was vry hot, sh
kpt fanning hrslf all th tim sh wnt on talking: “Dar, dar! How
qur vrything is to-day! And ystrday things wnt on just as usual.
I wondr if I’v bn changd in th night? Lt m think: was I th
sam whn I got up this morning? I almost think I can rmmbr fling
a littl diffrnt. But if I’m not th sam, th nxt qustion is, Who
in th world am I? Ah, _that’s_ th grat puzzl!” And sh bgan
thinking ovr all th childrn sh knw that wr of th sam ag as
hrslf, to s if sh could hav bn changd for any of thm.

“I’m sur I’m not Ada,” sh said, “for hr hair gos in such long
ringlts, and min dosn’t go in ringlts at all; and I’m sur I can’t
b Mabl, for I know all sorts of things, and sh, oh! sh knows such a
vry littl! Bsids, _sh’s_ sh, and _I’m_ I, and—oh dar, how
puzzling it all is! I’ll try if I know all th things I usd to know.
Lt m s: four tims fiv is twlv, and four tims six is thirtn,
and four tims svn is—oh dar! I shall nvr gt to twnty at that
rat! Howvr, th Multiplication Tabl dosn’t signify: lt’s try
Gography. London is th capital of Paris, and Paris is th capital of
Rom, and Rom—no, _that’s_ all wrong, I’m crtain! I must hav bn
changd for Mabl! I’ll try and say ‘_How doth th littl_—’” and sh
crossd hr hands on hr lap as if sh wr saying lssons, and bgan
to rpat it, but hr voic soundd hoars and strang, and th words
did not com th sam as thy usd to do:—

“How doth th littl crocodil
    Improv his shining tail,
And pour th watrs of th Nil
    On vry goldn scal!

“How chrfully h sms to grin,
    How natly sprad his claws,
And wlcom littl fishs in
    With gntly smiling jaws!”


“I’m sur thos ar not th right words,” said poor Alic, and hr ys
filld with tars again as sh wnt on, “I must b Mabl aftr all, and
I shall hav to go and liv in that poky littl hous, and hav nxt to
no toys to play with, and oh! vr so many lssons to larn! No, I’v
mad up my mind about it; if I’m Mabl, I’ll stay down hr! It’ll b
no us thir putting thir hads down and saying ‘Com up again, dar!’
I shall only look up and say ‘Who am I thn? Tll m that first, and
thn, if I lik bing that prson, I’ll com up: if not, I’ll stay down
hr till I’m sombody ls’—but, oh dar!” crid Alic, with a suddn
burst of tars, “I do wish thy _would_ put thir hads down! I am so
_vry_ tird of bing all alon hr!”

As sh said this sh lookd down at hr hands, and was surprisd to s
that sh had put on on of th Rabbit’s littl whit kid glovs whil
sh was talking. “How _can_ I hav don that?” sh thought. “I must b
growing small again.” Sh got up and wnt to th tabl to masur
hrslf by it, and found that, as narly as sh could guss, sh was
now about two ft high, and was going on shrinking rapidly: sh soon
found out that th caus of this was th fan sh was holding, and sh
droppd it hastily, just in tim to avoid shrinking away altogthr.

“That _was_ a narrow scap!” said Alic, a good dal frightnd at th
suddn chang, but vry glad to find hrslf still in xistnc; “and
now for th gardn!” and sh ran with all spd back to th littl
door: but, alas! th littl door was shut again, and th littl goldn
ky was lying on th glass tabl as bfor, “and things ar wors than
vr,” thought th poor child, “for I nvr was so small as this
bfor, nvr! And I dclar it’s too bad, that it is!”

As sh said ths words hr foot slippd, and in anothr momnt,
splash! sh was up to hr chin in salt watr. Hr first ida was that
sh had somhow falln into th sa, “and in that cas I can go back by
railway,” sh said to hrslf. (Alic had bn to th sasid onc in
hr lif, and had com to th gnral conclusion, that whrvr you go
to on th English coast you find a numbr of bathing machins in th
sa, som childrn digging in th sand with woodn spads, thn a row
of lodging houss, and bhind thm a railway station.) Howvr, sh
soon mad out that sh was in th pool of tars which sh had wpt whn
sh was nin ft high.

“I wish I hadn’t crid so much!” said Alic, as sh swam about, trying
to find hr way out. “I shall b punishd for it now, I suppos, by
bing drownd in my own tars! That _will_ b a qur thing, to b
sur! Howvr, vrything is qur to-day.”

Just thn sh hard somthing splashing about in th pool a littl way
off, and sh swam narr to mak out what it was: at first sh thought
it must b a walrus or hippopotamus, but thn sh rmmbrd how small
sh was now, and sh soon mad out that it was only a mous that had
slippd in lik hrslf.

“Would it b of any us, now,” thought Alic, “to spak to this mous?
Evrything is so out-of-th-way down hr, that I should think vry
likly it can talk: at any rat, thr’s no harm in trying.” So sh
bgan: “O Mous, do you know th way out of this pool? I am vry tird
of swimming about hr, O Mous!” (Alic thought this must b th right
way of spaking to a mous: sh had nvr don such a thing bfor, but
sh rmmbrd having sn in hr brothr’s Latin Grammar, “A mous—of
a mous—to a mous—a mous—O mous!”) Th Mous lookd at hr rathr
inquisitivly, and smd to hr to wink with on of its littl ys,
but it said nothing.

“Prhaps it dosn’t undrstand English,” thought Alic; “I darsay it’s
a Frnch mous, com ovr with William th Conquror.” (For, with all
hr knowldg of history, Alic had no vry clar notion how long ago
anything had happnd.) So sh bgan again: “Où st ma chatt?” which
was th first sntnc in hr Frnch lsson-book. Th Mous gav a
suddn lap out of th watr, and smd to quivr all ovr with
fright. “Oh, I bg your pardon!” crid Alic hastily, afraid that sh
had hurt th poor animal’s flings. “I quit forgot you didn’t lik
cats.”

“Not lik cats!” crid th Mous, in a shrill, passionat voic. “Would
_you_ lik cats if you wr m?”

“Wll, prhaps not,” said Alic in a soothing ton: “don’t b angry
about it. And yt I wish I could show you our cat Dinah: I think you’d
tak a fancy to cats if you could only s hr. Sh is such a dar
quit thing,” Alic wnt on, half to hrslf, as sh swam lazily about
in th pool, “and sh sits purring so nicly by th fir, licking hr
paws and washing hr fac—and sh is such a nic soft thing to
nurs—and sh’s such a capital on for catching mic—oh, I bg your
pardon!” crid Alic again, for this tim th Mous was bristling all
ovr, and sh flt crtain it must b rally offndd. “W won’t talk
about hr any mor if you’d rathr not.”

“W indd!” crid th Mous, who was trmbling down to th nd of his
tail. “As if _I_ would talk on such a subjct! Our family always
_hatd_ cats: nasty, low, vulgar things! Don’t lt m har th nam
again!”

“I won’t indd!” said Alic, in a grat hurry to chang th subjct of
convrsation. “Ar you—ar you fond—of—of dogs?” Th Mous did not
answr, so Alic wnt on agrly: “Thr is such a nic littl dog nar
our hous I should lik to show you! A littl bright-yd trrir, you
know, with oh, such long curly brown hair! And it’ll ftch things whn
you throw thm, and it’ll sit up and bg for its dinnr, and all sorts
of things—I can’t rmmbr half of thm—and it blongs to a farmr, you
know, and h says it’s so usful, it’s worth a hundrd pounds! H says
it kills all th rats and—oh dar!” crid Alic in a sorrowful ton,
“I’m afraid I’v offndd it again!” For th Mous was swimming away
from hr as hard as it could go, and making quit a commotion in th
pool as it wnt.

So sh calld softly aftr it, “Mous dar! Do com back again, and w
won’t talk about cats or dogs ithr, if you don’t lik thm!” Whn th
Mous hard this, it turnd round and swam slowly back to hr: its fac
was quit pal (with passion, Alic thought), and it said in a low
trmbling voic, “Lt us gt to th shor, and thn I’ll tll you my
history, and you’ll undrstand why it is I hat cats and dogs.”

It was high tim to go, for th pool was gtting quit crowdd with th
birds and animals that had falln into it: thr wr a Duck and a
Dodo, a Lory and an Eaglt, and svral othr curious craturs. Alic
ld th way, and th whol party swam to th shor.




CHAPTER III.
A Caucus-Rac and a Long Tal


Thy wr indd a qur-looking party that assmbld on th bank—th
birds with draggld fathrs, th animals with thir fur clinging clos
to thm, and all dripping wt, cross, and uncomfortabl.

Th first qustion of cours was, how to gt dry again: thy had a
consultation about this, and aftr a fw minuts it smd quit
natural to Alic to find hrslf talking familiarly with thm, as if
sh had known thm all hr lif. Indd, sh had quit a long argumnt
with th Lory, who at last turnd sulky, and would only say, “I am
oldr than you, and must know bttr;” and this Alic would not allow
without knowing how old it was, and, as th Lory positivly rfusd to
tll its ag, thr was no mor to b said.

At last th Mous, who smd to b a prson of authority among thm,
calld out, “Sit down, all of you, and listn to m! _I’ll_ soon mak
you dry nough!” Thy all sat down at onc, in a larg ring, with th
Mous in th middl. Alic kpt hr ys anxiously fixd on it, for sh
flt sur sh would catch a bad cold if sh did not gt dry vry soon.

“Ahm!” said th Mous with an important air, “ar you all rady? This
is th drist thing I know. Silnc all round, if you plas! ‘William
th Conquror, whos caus was favourd by th pop, was soon submittd
to by th English, who wantd ladrs, and had bn of lat much
accustomd to usurpation and conqust. Edwin and Morcar, th arls of
Mrcia and Northumbria—’”

“Ugh!” said th Lory, with a shivr.

“I bg your pardon!” said th Mous, frowning, but vry politly: “Did
you spak?”

“Not I!” said th Lory hastily.

“I thought you did,” said th Mous. “—I procd. ‘Edwin and Morcar,
th arls of Mrcia and Northumbria, dclard for him: and vn
Stigand, th patriotic archbishop of Cantrbury, found it advisabl—’”

“Found _what_?” said th Duck.

“Found _it_,” th Mous rplid rathr crossly: “of cours you know
what ‘it’ mans.”

“I know what ‘it’ mans wll nough, whn _I_ find a thing,” said th
Duck: “it’s gnrally a frog or a worm. Th qustion is, what did th
archbishop find?”

Th Mous did not notic this qustion, but hurridly wnt on, “‘—found
it advisabl to go with Edgar Athling to mt William and offr him
th crown. William’s conduct at first was modrat. But th insolnc
of his Normans—’ How ar you gtting on now, my dar?” it continud,
turning to Alic as it spok.

“As wt as vr,” said Alic in a mlancholy ton: “it dosn’t sm to
dry m at all.”

“In that cas,” said th Dodo solmnly, rising to its ft, “I mov
that th mting adjourn, for th immdiat adoption of mor nrgtic
rmdis—”

“Spak English!” said th Eaglt. “I don’t know th maning of half
thos long words, and, what’s mor, I don’t bliv you do ithr!” And
th Eaglt bnt down its had to hid a smil: som of th othr birds
tittrd audibly.

“What I was going to say,” said th Dodo in an offndd ton, “was,
that th bst thing to gt us dry would b a Caucus-rac.”

“What _is_ a Caucus-rac?” said Alic; not that sh wantd much to
know, but th Dodo had pausd as if it thought that _sombody_ ought to
spak, and no on ls smd inclind to say anything.

“Why,” said th Dodo, “th bst way to xplain it is to do it.” (And,
as you might lik to try th thing yourslf, som wintr day, I will
tll you how th Dodo managd it.)

First it markd out a rac-cours, in a sort of circl, (“th xact
shap dosn’t mattr,” it said,) and thn all th party wr placd
along th cours, hr and thr. Thr was no “On, two, thr, and
away,” but thy bgan running whn thy likd, and lft off whn thy
likd, so that it was not asy to know whn th rac was ovr. Howvr,
whn thy had bn running half an hour or so, and wr quit dry
again, th Dodo suddnly calld out “Th rac is ovr!” and thy all
crowdd round it, panting, and asking, “But who has won?”

This qustion th Dodo could not answr without a grat dal of
thought, and it sat for a long tim with on fingr prssd upon its
forhad (th position in which you usually s Shakspar, in th
picturs of him), whil th rst waitd in silnc. At last th Dodo
said, “_Evrybody_ has won, and all must hav prizs.”

“But who is to giv th prizs?” quit a chorus of voics askd.

“Why, _sh_, of cours,” said th Dodo, pointing to Alic with on
fingr; and th whol party at onc crowdd round hr, calling out in a
confusd way, “Prizs! Prizs!”

Alic had no ida what to do, and in dspair sh put hr hand in hr
pockt, and pulld out a box of comfits, (luckily th salt watr had
not got into it), and handd thm round as prizs. Thr was xactly
on a-pic, all round.

“But sh must hav a priz hrslf, you know,” said th Mous.

“Of cours,” th Dodo rplid vry gravly. “What ls hav you got in
your pockt?” h wnt on, turning to Alic.

“Only a thimbl,” said Alic sadly.

“Hand it ovr hr,” said th Dodo.

Thn thy all crowdd round hr onc mor, whil th Dodo solmnly
prsntd th thimbl, saying “W bg your accptanc of this lgant
thimbl;” and, whn it had finishd this short spch, thy all
chrd.

Alic thought th whol thing vry absurd, but thy all lookd so grav
that sh did not dar to laugh; and, as sh could not think of anything
to say, sh simply bowd, and took th thimbl, looking as solmn as
sh could.

Th nxt thing was to at th comfits: this causd som nois and
confusion, as th larg birds complaind that thy could not tast
thirs, and th small ons chokd and had to b pattd on th back.
Howvr, it was ovr at last, and thy sat down again in a ring, and
bggd th Mous to tll thm somthing mor.

“You promisd to tll m your history, you know,” said Alic, “and why
it is you hat—C and D,” sh addd in a whispr, half afraid that it
would b offndd again.

“Min is a long and a sad tal!” said th Mous, turning to Alic, and
sighing.

“It _is_ a long tail, crtainly,” said Alic, looking down with wondr
at th Mous’s tail; “but why do you call it sad?” And sh kpt on
puzzling about it whil th Mous was spaking, so that hr ida of th
tal was somthing lik this:—

         “Fury said to a mous, That h mt in th hous, ‘Lt us both
         go to law: _I_ will proscut _you_.—Com, I’ll tak no
         dnial; W must hav a trial: For rally this morning I’v
         nothing to do.’ Said th mous to th cur, ‘Such a trial, dar
         sir, With no jury or judg, would b wasting our brath.’
         ‘I’ll b judg, I’ll b jury,’ Said cunning old Fury: ‘I’ll
         try th whol caus, and condmn you to dath.’”

“You ar not attnding!” said th Mous to Alic svrly. “What ar
you thinking of?”

“I bg your pardon,” said Alic vry humbly: “you had got to th fifth
bnd, I think?”

“I had _not!_” crid th Mous, sharply and vry angrily.

“A knot!” said Alic, always rady to mak hrslf usful, and looking
anxiously about hr. “Oh, do lt m hlp to undo it!”

“I shall do nothing of th sort,” said th Mous, gtting up and
walking away. “You insult m by talking such nonsns!”

“I didn’t man it!” pladd poor Alic. “But you’r so asily offndd,
you know!”

Th Mous only growld in rply.

“Plas com back and finish your story!” Alic calld aftr it; and
th othrs all joind in chorus, “Ys, plas do!” but th Mous only
shook its had impatintly, and walkd a littl quickr.

“What a pity it wouldn’t stay!” sighd th Lory, as soon as it was
quit out of sight; and an old Crab took th opportunity of saying to
hr daughtr “Ah, my dar! Lt this b a lsson to you nvr to los
_your_ tmpr!” “Hold your tongu, Ma!” said th young Crab, a littl
snappishly. “You’r nough to try th patinc of an oystr!”

“I wish I had our Dinah hr, I know I do!” said Alic aloud,
addrssing nobody in particular. “Sh’d soon ftch it back!”

“And who is Dinah, if I might vntur to ask th qustion?” said th
Lory.

Alic rplid agrly, for sh was always rady to talk about hr pt:
“Dinah’s our cat. And sh’s such a capital on for catching mic you
can’t think! And oh, I wish you could s hr aftr th birds! Why,
sh’ll at a littl bird as soon as look at it!”

This spch causd a rmarkabl snsation among th party. Som of th
birds hurrid off at onc: on old Magpi bgan wrapping itslf up vry
carfully, rmarking, “I rally must b gtting hom; th night-air
dosn’t suit my throat!” and a Canary calld out in a trmbling voic
to its childrn, “Com away, my dars! It’s high tim you wr all in
bd!” On various prtxts thy all movd off, and Alic was soon lft
alon.

“I wish I hadn’t mntiond Dinah!” sh said to hrslf in a mlancholy
ton. “Nobody sms to lik hr, down hr, and I’m sur sh’s th bst
cat in th world! Oh, my dar Dinah! I wondr if I shall vr s you
any mor!” And hr poor Alic bgan to cry again, for sh flt vry
lonly and low-spiritd. In a littl whil, howvr, sh again hard a
littl pattring of footstps in th distanc, and sh lookd up
agrly, half hoping that th Mous had changd his mind, and was
coming back to finish his story.




CHAPTER IV.
Th Rabbit Snds in a Littl Bill


It was th Whit Rabbit, trotting slowly back again, and looking
anxiously about as it wnt, as if it had lost somthing; and sh hard
it muttring to itslf “Th Duchss! Th Duchss! Oh my dar paws! Oh
my fur and whiskrs! Sh’ll gt m xcutd, as sur as frrts ar
frrts! Whr _can_ I hav droppd thm, I wondr?” Alic gussd in a
momnt that it was looking for th fan and th pair of whit kid
glovs, and sh vry good-naturdly bgan hunting about for thm, but
thy wr nowhr to b sn—vrything smd to hav changd sinc
hr swim in th pool, and th grat hall, with th glass tabl and th
littl door, had vanishd compltly.

Vry soon th Rabbit noticd Alic, as sh wnt hunting about, and
calld out to hr in an angry ton, “Why, Mary Ann, what _ar_ you
doing out hr? Run hom this momnt, and ftch m a pair of glovs and
a fan! Quick, now!” And Alic was so much frightnd that sh ran off
at onc in th dirction it pointd to, without trying to xplain th
mistak it had mad.

“H took m for his housmaid,” sh said to hrslf as sh ran. “How
surprisd h’ll b whn h finds out who I am! But I’d bttr tak him
his fan and glovs—that is, if I can find thm.” As sh said this, sh
cam upon a nat littl hous, on th door of which was a bright brass
plat with th nam “W. RABBIT,” ngravd upon it. Sh wnt in without
knocking, and hurrid upstairs, in grat far lst sh should mt th
ral Mary Ann, and b turnd out of th hous bfor sh had found th
fan and glovs.

“How qur it sms,” Alic said to hrslf, “to b going mssags for
a rabbit! I suppos Dinah’ll b snding m on mssags nxt!” And sh
bgan fancying th sort of thing that would happn: “‘Miss Alic! Com
hr dirctly, and gt rady for your walk!’ ‘Coming in a minut,
nurs! But I’v got to s that th mous dosn’t gt out.’ Only I
don’t think,” Alic wnt on, “that thy’d lt Dinah stop in th hous
if it bgan ordring popl about lik that!”

By this tim sh had found hr way into a tidy littl room with a tabl
in th window, and on it (as sh had hopd) a fan and two or thr
pairs of tiny whit kid glovs: sh took up th fan and a pair of th
glovs, and was just going to lav th room, whn hr y fll upon a
littl bottl that stood nar th looking-glass. Thr was no labl
this tim with th words “DRINK ME,” but nvrthlss sh uncorkd it
and put it to hr lips. “I know _somthing_ intrsting is sur to
happn,” sh said to hrslf, “whnvr I at or drink anything; so
I’ll just s what this bottl dos. I do hop it’ll mak m grow larg
again, for rally I’m quit tird of bing such a tiny littl thing!”

It did so indd, and much soonr than sh had xpctd: bfor sh had
drunk half th bottl, sh found hr had prssing against th ciling,
and had to stoop to sav hr nck from bing brokn. Sh hastily put
down th bottl, saying to hrslf “That’s quit nough—I hop I shan’t
grow any mor—As it is, I can’t gt out at th door—I do wish I hadn’t
drunk quit so much!”

Alas! it was too lat to wish that! Sh wnt on growing, and growing,
and vry soon had to knl down on th floor: in anothr minut thr
was not vn room for this, and sh trid th ffct of lying down with
on lbow against th door, and th othr arm curld round hr had.
Still sh wnt on growing, and, as a last rsourc, sh put on arm out
of th window, and on foot up th chimny, and said to hrslf “Now I
can do no mor, whatvr happns. What _will_ bcom of m?”

Luckily for Alic, th littl magic bottl had now had its full ffct,
and sh grw no largr: still it was vry uncomfortabl, and, as thr
smd to b no sort of chanc of hr vr gtting out of th room
again, no wondr sh flt unhappy.

“It was much plasantr at hom,” thought poor Alic, “whn on wasn’t
always growing largr and smallr, and bing ordrd about by mic and
rabbits. I almost wish I hadn’t gon down that rabbit-hol—and yt—and
yt—it’s rathr curious, you know, this sort of lif! I do wondr what
_can_ hav happnd to m! Whn I usd to rad fairy-tals, I fancid
that kind of thing nvr happnd, and now hr I am in th middl of
on! Thr ought to b a book writtn about m, that thr ought! And
whn I grow up, I’ll writ on—but I’m grown up now,” sh addd in a
sorrowful ton; “at last thr’s no room to grow up any mor _hr_.”

“But thn,” thought Alic, “shall I _nvr_ gt any oldr than I am
now? That’ll b a comfort, on way—nvr to b an old woman—but
thn—always to hav lssons to larn! Oh, I shouldn’t lik _that!_”

“Oh, you foolish Alic!” sh answrd hrslf. “How can you larn
lssons in hr? Why, thr’s hardly room for _you_, and no room at all
for any lsson-books!”

And so sh wnt on, taking first on sid and thn th othr, and
making quit a convrsation of it altogthr; but aftr a fw minuts
sh hard a voic outsid, and stoppd to listn.

“Mary Ann! Mary Ann!” said th voic. “Ftch m my glovs this momnt!”
Thn cam a littl pattring of ft on th stairs. Alic knw it was
th Rabbit coming to look for hr, and sh trmbld till sh shook th
hous, quit forgtting that sh was now about a thousand tims as
larg as th Rabbit, and had no rason to b afraid of it.

Prsntly th Rabbit cam up to th door, and trid to opn it; but, as
th door opnd inwards, and Alic’s lbow was prssd hard against it,
that attmpt provd a failur. Alic hard it say to itslf “Thn I’ll
go round and gt in at th window.”

“_That_ you won’t!” thought Alic, and, aftr waiting till sh fancid
sh hard th Rabbit just undr th window, sh suddnly sprad out hr
hand, and mad a snatch in th air. Sh did not gt hold of anything,
but sh hard a littl shrik and a fall, and a crash of brokn glass,
from which sh concludd that it was just possibl it had falln into a
cucumbr-fram, or somthing of th sort.

Nxt cam an angry voic—th Rabbit’s—“Pat! Pat! Whr ar you?” And
thn a voic sh had nvr hard bfor, “Sur thn I’m hr! Digging
for appls, yr honour!”

“Digging for appls, indd!” said th Rabbit angrily. “Hr! Com and
hlp m out of _this!_” (Sounds of mor brokn glass.)

“Now tll m, Pat, what’s that in th window?”

“Sur, it’s an arm, yr honour!” (H pronouncd it “arrum.”)

“An arm, you goos! Who vr saw on that siz? Why, it fills th whol
window!”

“Sur, it dos, yr honour: but it’s an arm for all that.”

“Wll, it’s got no businss thr, at any rat: go and tak it away!”

Thr was a long silnc aftr this, and Alic could only har whisprs
now and thn; such as, “Sur, I don’t lik it, yr honour, at all, at
all!” “Do as I tll you, you coward!” and at last sh sprad out hr
hand again, and mad anothr snatch in th air. This tim thr wr
_two_ littl shriks, and mor sounds of brokn glass. “What a numbr
of cucumbr-frams thr must b!” thought Alic. “I wondr what
thy’ll do nxt! As for pulling m out of th window, I only wish thy
_could!_ I’m sur _I_ don’t want to stay in hr any longr!”

Sh waitd for som tim without haring anything mor: at last cam a
rumbling of littl cartwhls, and th sound of a good many voics all
talking togthr: sh mad out th words: “Whr’s th othr
laddr?—Why, I hadn’t to bring but on; Bill’s got th othr—Bill!
ftch it hr, lad!—Hr, put ’m up at this cornr—No, ti ’m
togthr first—thy don’t rach half high nough yt—Oh! thy’ll do
wll nough; don’t b particular—Hr, Bill! catch hold of this
rop—Will th roof bar?—Mind that loos slat—Oh, it’s coming down!
Hads blow!” (a loud crash)—“Now, who did that?—It was Bill, I
fancy—Who’s to go down th chimny?—Nay, _I_ shan’t! _You_ do
it!—_That_ I won’t, thn!—Bill’s to go down—Hr, Bill! th mastr says
you’r to go down th chimny!”

“Oh! So Bill’s got to com down th chimny, has h?” said Alic to
hrslf. “Shy, thy sm to put vrything upon Bill! I wouldn’t b in
Bill’s plac for a good dal: this firplac is narrow, to b sur; but
I _think_ I can kick a littl!”

Sh drw hr foot as far down th chimny as sh could, and waitd till
sh hard a littl animal (sh couldn’t guss of what sort it was)
scratching and scrambling about in th chimny clos abov hr: thn,
saying to hrslf “This is Bill,” sh gav on sharp kick, and waitd
to s what would happn nxt.

Th first thing sh hard was a gnral chorus of “Thr gos Bill!”
thn th Rabbit’s voic along—“Catch him, you by th hdg!” thn
silnc, and thn anothr confusion of voics—“Hold up his had—Brandy
now—Don’t chok him—How was it, old fllow? What happnd to you? Tll
us all about it!”

Last cam a littl fbl, squaking voic, (“That’s Bill,” thought
Alic,) “Wll, I hardly know—No mor, thank y; I’m bttr now—but I’m
a dal too flustrd to tll you—all I know is, somthing coms at m
lik a Jack-in-th-box, and up I gos lik a sky-rockt!”

“So you did, old fllow!” said th othrs.

“W must burn th hous down!” said th Rabbit’s voic; and Alic
calld out as loud as sh could, “If you do, I’ll st Dinah at you!”

Thr was a dad silnc instantly, and Alic thought to hrslf, “I
wondr what thy _will_ do nxt! If thy had any sns, thy’d tak th
roof off.” Aftr a minut or two, thy bgan moving about again, and
Alic hard th Rabbit say, “A barrowful will do, to bgin with.”

“A barrowful of _what?_” thought Alic; but sh had not long to doubt,
for th nxt momnt a showr of littl pbbls cam rattling in at th
window, and som of thm hit hr in th fac. “I’ll put a stop to
this,” sh said to hrslf, and shoutd out, “You’d bttr not do that
again!” which producd anothr dad silnc.

Alic noticd with som surpris that th pbbls wr all turning into
littl caks as thy lay on th floor, and a bright ida cam into hr
had. “If I at on of ths caks,” sh thought, “it’s sur to mak
_som_ chang in my siz; and as it can’t possibly mak m largr, it
must mak m smallr, I suppos.”

So sh swallowd on of th caks, and was dlightd to find that sh
bgan shrinking dirctly. As soon as sh was small nough to gt
through th door, sh ran out of th hous, and found quit a crowd of
littl animals and birds waiting outsid. Th poor littl Lizard, Bill,
was in th middl, bing hld up by two guina-pigs, who wr giving it
somthing out of a bottl. Thy all mad a rush at Alic th momnt sh
appard; but sh ran off as hard as sh could, and soon found hrslf
saf in a thick wood.

“Th first thing I’v got to do,” said Alic to hrslf, as sh
wandrd about in th wood, “is to grow to my right siz again; and th
scond thing is to find my way into that lovly gardn. I think that
will b th bst plan.”

It soundd an xcllnt plan, no doubt, and vry natly and simply
arrangd; th only difficulty was, that sh had not th smallst ida
how to st about it; and whil sh was pring about anxiously among
th trs, a littl sharp bark just ovr hr had mad hr look up in a
grat hurry.

An normous puppy was looking down at hr with larg round ys, and
fbly strtching out on paw, trying to touch hr. “Poor littl
thing!” said Alic, in a coaxing ton, and sh trid hard to whistl to
it; but sh was trribly frightnd all th tim at th thought that it
might b hungry, in which cas it would b vry likly to at hr up in
spit of all hr coaxing.

Hardly knowing what sh did, sh pickd up a littl bit of stick, and
hld it out to th puppy; whrupon th puppy jumpd into th air off
all its ft at onc, with a ylp of dlight, and rushd at th stick,
and mad bliv to worry it; thn Alic dodgd bhind a grat thistl,
to kp hrslf from bing run ovr; and th momnt sh appard on th
othr sid, th puppy mad anothr rush at th stick, and tumbld had
ovr hls in its hurry to gt hold of it; thn Alic, thinking it was
vry lik having a gam of play with a cart-hors, and xpcting vry
momnt to b trampld undr its ft, ran round th thistl again; thn
th puppy bgan a sris of short chargs at th stick, running a vry
littl way forwards ach tim and a long way back, and barking hoarsly
all th whil, till at last it sat down a good way off, panting, with
its tongu hanging out of its mouth, and its grat ys half shut.

This smd to Alic a good opportunity for making hr scap; so sh
st off at onc, and ran till sh was quit tird and out of brath,
and till th puppy’s bark soundd quit faint in th distanc.

“And yt what a dar littl puppy it was!” said Alic, as sh lant
against a buttrcup to rst hrslf, and fannd hrslf with on of th
lavs: “I should hav likd taching it tricks vry much, if—if I’d
only bn th right siz to do it! Oh dar! I’d narly forgottn that
I’v got to grow up again! Lt m s—how _is_ it to b managd? I
suppos I ought to at or drink somthing or othr; but th grat
qustion is, what?”

Th grat qustion crtainly was, what? Alic lookd all round hr at
th flowrs and th blads of grass, but sh did not s anything that
lookd lik th right thing to at or drink undr th circumstancs.
Thr was a larg mushroom growing nar hr, about th sam hight as
hrslf; and whn sh had lookd undr it, and on both sids of it, and
bhind it, it occurrd to hr that sh might as wll look and s what
was on th top of it.

Sh strtchd hrslf up on tipto, and ppd ovr th dg of th
mushroom, and hr ys immdiatly mt thos of a larg blu
catrpillar, that was sitting on th top with its arms foldd, quitly
smoking a long hookah, and taking not th smallst notic of hr or of
anything ls.




CHAPTER V.
Advic from a Catrpillar


Th Catrpillar and Alic lookd at ach othr for som tim in
silnc: at last th Catrpillar took th hookah out of its mouth, and
addrssd hr in a languid, slpy voic.

“Who ar _you?_” said th Catrpillar.

This was not an ncouraging opning for a convrsation. Alic rplid,
rathr shyly, “I—I hardly know, sir, just at prsnt—at last I know
who I _was_ whn I got up this morning, but I think I must hav bn
changd svral tims sinc thn.”

“What do you man by that?” said th Catrpillar strnly. “Explain
yourslf!”

“I can’t xplain _myslf_, I’m afraid, sir,” said Alic, “bcaus I’m
not myslf, you s.”

“I don’t s,” said th Catrpillar.

“I’m afraid I can’t put it mor clarly,” Alic rplid vry politly,
“for I can’t undrstand it myslf to bgin with; and bing so many
diffrnt sizs in a day is vry confusing.”

“It isn’t,” said th Catrpillar.

“Wll, prhaps you havn’t found it so yt,” said Alic; “but whn you
hav to turn into a chrysalis—you will som day, you know—and thn
aftr that into a buttrfly, I should think you’ll fl it a littl
qur, won’t you?”

“Not a bit,” said th Catrpillar.

“Wll, prhaps your flings may b diffrnt,” said Alic; “all I know
is, it would fl vry qur to _m_.”

“You!” said th Catrpillar contmptuously. “Who ar _you?_”

Which brought thm back again to th bginning of th convrsation.
Alic flt a littl irritatd at th Catrpillar’s making such _vry_
short rmarks, and sh drw hrslf up and said, vry gravly, “I
think, you ought to tll m who _you_ ar, first.”

“Why?” said th Catrpillar.

Hr was anothr puzzling qustion; and as Alic could not think of any
good rason, and as th Catrpillar smd to b in a _vry_ unplasant
stat of mind, sh turnd away.

“Com back!” th Catrpillar calld aftr hr. “I’v somthing
important to say!”

This soundd promising, crtainly: Alic turnd and cam back again.

“Kp your tmpr,” said th Catrpillar.

“Is that all?” said Alic, swallowing down hr angr as wll as sh
could.

“No,” said th Catrpillar.

Alic thought sh might as wll wait, as sh had nothing ls to do,
and prhaps aftr all it might tll hr somthing worth haring. For
som minuts it puffd away without spaking, but at last it unfoldd
its arms, took th hookah out of its mouth again, and said, “So you
think you’r changd, do you?”

“I’m afraid I am, sir,” said Alic; “I can’t rmmbr things as I
usd—and I don’t kp th sam siz for tn minuts togthr!”

“Can’t rmmbr _what_ things?” said th Catrpillar.

“Wll, I’v trid to say “How doth th littl busy b,” but it all
cam diffrnt!” Alic rplid in a vry mlancholy voic.

“Rpat, “_You ar old, Fathr William_,’” said th Catrpillar.

Alic foldd hr hands, and bgan:—

“You ar old, Fathr William,” th young man said,
    “And your hair has bcom vry whit;
And yt you incssantly stand on your had—
    Do you think, at your ag, it is right?”

“In my youth,” Fathr William rplid to his son,
    “I fard it might injur th brain;
But, now that I’m prfctly sur I hav non,
    Why, I do it again and again.”

“You ar old,” said th youth, “as I mntiond bfor,
    And hav grown most uncommonly fat;
Yt you turnd a back-somrsault in at th door—
    Pray, what is th rason of that?”

“In my youth,” said th sag, as h shook his gry locks,
    “I kpt all my limbs vry suppl
By th us of this ointmnt—on shilling th box—
    Allow m to sll you a coupl?”

“You ar old,” said th youth, “and your jaws ar too wak
    For anything toughr than sut;
Yt you finishd th goos, with th bons and th bak—
    Pray, how did you manag to do it?”

“In my youth,” said his fathr, “I took to th law,
    And argud ach cas with my wif;
And th muscular strngth, which it gav to my jaw,
    Has lastd th rst of my lif.”

“You ar old,” said th youth, “on would hardly suppos
    That your y was as stady as vr;
Yt you balancd an l on th nd of your nos—
    What mad you so awfully clvr?”

“I hav answrd thr qustions, and that is nough,”
    Said his fathr; “don’t giv yourslf airs!
Do you think I can listn all day to such stuff?
    B off, or I’ll kick you down stairs!”


“That is not said right,” said th Catrpillar.

“Not _quit_ right, I’m afraid,” said Alic, timidly; “som of th
words hav got altrd.”

“It is wrong from bginning to nd,” said th Catrpillar dciddly,
and thr was silnc for som minuts.

Th Catrpillar was th first to spak.

“What siz do you want to b?” it askd.

“Oh, I’m not particular as to siz,” Alic hastily rplid; “only on
dosn’t lik changing so oftn, you know.”

“I _don’t_ know,” said th Catrpillar.

Alic said nothing: sh had nvr bn so much contradictd in hr lif
bfor, and sh flt that sh was losing hr tmpr.

“Ar you contnt now?” said th Catrpillar.

“Wll, I should lik to b a _littl_ largr, sir, if you wouldn’t
mind,” said Alic: “thr inchs is such a wrtchd hight to b.”

“It is a vry good hight indd!” said th Catrpillar angrily,
raring itslf upright as it spok (it was xactly thr inchs high).

“But I’m not usd to it!” pladd poor Alic in a pitous ton. And sh
thought of hrslf, “I wish th craturs wouldn’t b so asily
offndd!”

“You’ll gt usd to it in tim,” said th Catrpillar; and it put th
hookah into its mouth and bgan smoking again.

This tim Alic waitd patintly until it chos to spak again. In a
minut or two th Catrpillar took th hookah out of its mouth and
yawnd onc or twic, and shook itslf. Thn it got down off th
mushroom, and crawld away in th grass, mrly rmarking as it wnt,
“On sid will mak you grow tallr, and th othr sid will mak you
grow shortr.”

“On sid of _what?_ Th othr sid of _what?_” thought Alic to
hrslf.

“Of th mushroom,” said th Catrpillar, just as if sh had askd it
aloud; and in anothr momnt it was out of sight.

Alic rmaind looking thoughtfully at th mushroom for a minut,
trying to mak out which wr th two sids of it; and as it was
prfctly round, sh found this a vry difficult qustion. Howvr, at
last sh strtchd hr arms round it as far as thy would go, and brok
off a bit of th dg with ach hand.

“And now which is which?” sh said to hrslf, and nibbld a littl of
th right-hand bit to try th ffct: th nxt momnt sh flt a
violnt blow undrnath hr chin: it had struck hr foot!

Sh was a good dal frightnd by this vry suddn chang, but sh flt
that thr was no tim to b lost, as sh was shrinking rapidly; so sh
st to work at onc to at som of th othr bit. Hr chin was prssd
so closly against hr foot, that thr was hardly room to opn hr
mouth; but sh did it at last, and managd to swallow a morsl of th
lfthand bit.

*      *      *      *      *      *      *

    *      *      *      *      *      *

*      *      *      *      *      *      *


“Com, my had’s fr at last!” said Alic in a ton of dlight, which
changd into alarm in anothr momnt, whn sh found that hr shouldrs
wr nowhr to b found: all sh could s, whn sh lookd down, was
an immns lngth of nck, which smd to ris lik a stalk out of a
sa of grn lavs that lay far blow hr.

“What _can_ all that grn stuff b?” said Alic. “And whr _hav_ my
shouldrs got to? And oh, my poor hands, how is it I can’t s you?”
Sh was moving thm about as sh spok, but no rsult smd to follow,
xcpt a littl shaking among th distant grn lavs.

As thr smd to b no chanc of gtting hr hands up to hr had,
sh trid to gt hr had down to thm, and was dlightd to find that
hr nck would bnd about asily in any dirction, lik a srpnt. Sh
had just succdd in curving it down into a gracful zigzag, and was
going to div in among th lavs, which sh found to b nothing but
th tops of th trs undr which sh had bn wandring, whn a sharp
hiss mad hr draw back in a hurry: a larg pigon had flown into hr
fac, and was bating hr violntly with its wings.

“Srpnt!” scramd th Pigon.

“I’m _not_ a srpnt!” said Alic indignantly. “Lt m alon!”

“Srpnt, I say again!” rpatd th Pigon, but in a mor subdud
ton, and addd with a kind of sob, “I’v trid vry way, and nothing
sms to suit thm!”

“I havn’t th last ida what you’r talking about,” said Alic.

“I’v trid th roots of trs, and I’v trid banks, and I’v trid
hdgs,” th Pigon wnt on, without attnding to hr; “but thos
srpnts! Thr’s no plasing thm!”

Alic was mor and mor puzzld, but sh thought thr was no us in
saying anything mor till th Pigon had finishd.

“As if it wasn’t troubl nough hatching th ggs,” said th Pigon;
“but I must b on th look-out for srpnts night and day! Why, I
havn’t had a wink of slp ths thr wks!”

“I’m vry sorry you’v bn annoyd,” said Alic, who was bginning to
s its maning.

“And just as I’d takn th highst tr in th wood,” continud th
Pigon, raising its voic to a shrik, “and just as I was thinking I
should b fr of thm at last, thy must nds com wriggling down
from th sky! Ugh, Srpnt!”

“But I’m _not_ a srpnt, I tll you!” said Alic. “I’m a—I’m a—”

“Wll! _What_ ar you?” said th Pigon. “I can s you’r trying to
invnt somthing!”

“I—I’m a littl girl,” said Alic, rathr doubtfully, as sh rmmbrd
th numbr of changs sh had gon through that day.

“A likly story indd!” said th Pigon in a ton of th dpst
contmpt. “I’v sn a good many littl girls in my tim, but nvr
_on_ with such a nck as that! No, no! You’r a srpnt; and thr’s
no us dnying it. I suppos you’ll b tlling m nxt that you nvr
tastd an gg!”

“I _hav_ tastd ggs, crtainly,” said Alic, who was a vry truthful
child; “but littl girls at ggs quit as much as srpnts do, you
know.”

“I don’t bliv it,” said th Pigon; “but if thy do, why thn
thy’r a kind of srpnt, that’s all I can say.”

This was such a nw ida to Alic, that sh was quit silnt for a
minut or two, which gav th Pigon th opportunity of adding, “You’r
looking for ggs, I know _that_ wll nough; and what dos it mattr to
m whthr you’r a littl girl or a srpnt?”

“It mattrs a good dal to _m_,” said Alic hastily; “but I’m not
looking for ggs, as it happns; and if I was, I shouldn’t want
_yours_: I don’t lik thm raw.”

“Wll, b off, thn!” said th Pigon in a sulky ton, as it sttld
down again into its nst. Alic crouchd down among th trs as wll
as sh could, for hr nck kpt gtting ntangld among th branchs,
and vry now and thn sh had to stop and untwist it. Aftr a whil
sh rmmbrd that sh still hld th pics of mushroom in hr hands,
and sh st to work vry carfully, nibbling first at on and thn at
th othr, and growing somtims tallr and somtims shortr, until
sh had succdd in bringing hrslf down to hr usual hight.

It was so long sinc sh had bn anything nar th right siz, that it
flt quit strang at first; but sh got usd to it in a fw minuts,
and bgan talking to hrslf, as usual. “Com, thr’s half my plan
don now! How puzzling all ths changs ar! I’m nvr sur what I’m
going to b, from on minut to anothr! Howvr, I’v got back to my
right siz: th nxt thing is, to gt into that bautiful gardn—how
_is_ that to b don, I wondr?” As sh said this, sh cam suddnly
upon an opn plac, with a littl hous in it about four ft high.
“Whovr livs thr,” thought Alic, “it’ll nvr do to com upon thm
_this_ siz: why, I should frightn thm out of thir wits!” So sh
bgan nibbling at th righthand bit again, and did not vntur to go
nar th hous till sh had brought hrslf down to nin inchs high.




CHAPTER VI.
Pig and Pppr


For a minut or two sh stood looking at th hous, and wondring what
to do nxt, whn suddnly a footman in livry cam running out of th
wood—(sh considrd him to b a footman bcaus h was in livry:
othrwis, judging by his fac only, sh would hav calld him a
fish)—and rappd loudly at th door with his knuckls. It was opnd by
anothr footman in livry, with a round fac, and larg ys lik a
frog; and both footmn, Alic noticd, had powdrd hair that curld
all ovr thir hads. Sh flt vry curious to know what it was all
about, and crpt a littl way out of th wood to listn.

Th Fish-Footman bgan by producing from undr his arm a grat lttr,
narly as larg as himslf, and this h handd ovr to th othr,
saying, in a solmn ton, “For th Duchss. An invitation from th
Qun to play croqut.” Th Frog-Footman rpatd, in th sam solmn
ton, only changing th ordr of th words a littl, “From th Qun.
An invitation for th Duchss to play croqut.”

Thn thy both bowd low, and thir curls got ntangld togthr.

Alic laughd so much at this, that sh had to run back into th wood
for far of thir haring hr; and whn sh nxt ppd out th
Fish-Footman was gon, and th othr was sitting on th ground nar th
door, staring stupidly up into th sky.

Alic wnt timidly up to th door, and knockd.

“Thr’s no sort of us in knocking,” said th Footman, “and that for
two rasons. First, bcaus I’m on th sam sid of th door as you
ar; scondly, bcaus thy’r making such a nois insid, no on could
possibly har you.” And crtainly thr _was_ a most xtraordinary
nois going on within—a constant howling and snzing, and vry now
and thn a grat crash, as if a dish or kttl had bn brokn to
pics.

“Plas, thn,” said Alic, “how am I to gt in?”

“Thr might b som sns in your knocking,” th Footman wnt on
without attnding to hr, “if w had th door btwn us. For instanc,
if you wr _insid_, you might knock, and I could lt you out, you
know.” H was looking up into th sky all th tim h was spaking, and
this Alic thought dciddly uncivil. “But prhaps h can’t hlp it,”
sh said to hrslf; “his ys ar so _vry_ narly at th top of his
had. But at any rat h might answr qustions.—How am I to gt in?”
sh rpatd, aloud.

“I shall sit hr,” th Footman rmarkd, “till tomorrow—”

At this momnt th door of th hous opnd, and a larg plat cam
skimming out, straight at th Footman’s had: it just grazd his nos,
and brok to pics against on of th trs bhind him.

“—or nxt day, mayb,” th Footman continud in th sam ton, xactly
as if nothing had happnd.

“How am I to gt in?” askd Alic again, in a loudr ton.

“_Ar_ you to gt in at all?” said th Footman. “That’s th first
qustion, you know.”

It was, no doubt: only Alic did not lik to b told so. “It’s rally
dradful,” sh muttrd to hrslf, “th way all th craturs argu.
It’s nough to driv on crazy!”

Th Footman smd to think this a good opportunity for rpating his
rmark, with variations. “I shall sit hr,” h said, “on and off, for
days and days.”

“But what am _I_ to do?” said Alic.

“Anything you lik,” said th Footman, and bgan whistling.

“Oh, thr’s no us in talking to him,” said Alic dspratly: “h’s
prfctly idiotic!” And sh opnd th door and wnt in.

Th door ld right into a larg kitchn, which was full of smok from
on nd to th othr: th Duchss was sitting on a thr-lggd stool
in th middl, nursing a baby; th cook was laning ovr th fir,
stirring a larg cauldron which smd to b full of soup.

“Thr’s crtainly too much pppr in that soup!” Alic said to
hrslf, as wll as sh could for snzing.

Thr was crtainly too much of it in th air. Evn th Duchss snzd
occasionally; and as for th baby, it was snzing and howling
altrnatly without a momnt’s paus. Th only things in th kitchn
that did not snz, wr th cook, and a larg cat which was sitting
on th harth and grinning from ar to ar.

“Plas would you tll m,” said Alic, a littl timidly, for sh was
not quit sur whthr it was good mannrs for hr to spak first, “why
your cat grins lik that?”

“It’s a Chshir cat,” said th Duchss, “and that’s why. Pig!”

Sh said th last word with such suddn violnc that Alic quit
jumpd; but sh saw in anothr momnt that it was addrssd to th
baby, and not to hr, so sh took courag, and wnt on again:—

“I didn’t know that Chshir cats always grinnd; in fact, I didn’t
know that cats _could_ grin.”

“Thy all can,” said th Duchss; “and most of ’m do.”

“I don’t know of any that do,” Alic said vry politly, fling quit
plasd to hav got into a convrsation.

“You don’t know much,” said th Duchss; “and that’s a fact.”

Alic did not at all lik th ton of this rmark, and thought it would
b as wll to introduc som othr subjct of convrsation. Whil sh
was trying to fix on on, th cook took th cauldron of soup off th
fir, and at onc st to work throwing vrything within hr rach at
th Duchss and th baby—th fir-irons cam first; thn followd a
showr of saucpans, plats, and dishs. Th Duchss took no notic of
thm vn whn thy hit hr; and th baby was howling so much alrady,
that it was quit impossibl to say whthr th blows hurt it or not.

“Oh, _plas_ mind what you’r doing!” crid Alic, jumping up and down
in an agony of trror. “Oh, thr gos his _prcious_ nos!” as an
unusually larg saucpan flw clos by it, and vry narly carrid it
off.

“If vrybody mindd thir own businss,” th Duchss said in a hoars
growl, “th world would go round a dal fastr than it dos.”

“Which would _not_ b an advantag,” said Alic, who flt vry glad to
gt an opportunity of showing off a littl of hr knowldg. “Just
think of what work it would mak with th day and night! You s th
arth taks twnty-four hours to turn round on its axis—”

“Talking of axs,” said th Duchss, “chop off hr had!”

Alic glancd rathr anxiously at th cook, to s if sh mant to tak
th hint; but th cook was busily stirring th soup, and smd not to
b listning, so sh wnt on again: “Twnty-four hours, I _think_; or
is it twlv? I—”

“Oh, don’t bothr _m_,” said th Duchss; “I nvr could abid
figurs!” And with that sh bgan nursing hr child again, singing a
sort of lullaby to it as sh did so, and giving it a violnt shak at
th nd of vry lin:

“Spak roughly to your littl boy,
    And bat him whn h snzs:
H only dos it to annoy,
    Bcaus h knows it tass.”


CHORUS.
(In which th cook and th baby joind):


“Wow! wow! wow!”


Whil th Duchss sang th scond vrs of th song, sh kpt tossing
th baby violntly up and down, and th poor littl thing howld so,
that Alic could hardly har th words:—

“I spak svrly to my boy,
    I bat him whn h snzs;
For h can thoroughly njoy
    Th pppr whn h plass!”


CHORUS.


“Wow! wow! wow!”


“Hr! you may nurs it a bit, if you lik!” th Duchss said to Alic,
flinging th baby at hr as sh spok. “I must go and gt rady to play
croqut with th Qun,” and sh hurrid out of th room. Th cook
thrw a frying-pan aftr hr as sh wnt out, but it just missd hr.

Alic caught th baby with som difficulty, as it was a qur-shapd
littl cratur, and hld out its arms and lgs in all dirctions,
“just lik a star-fish,” thought Alic. Th poor littl thing was
snorting lik a stam-ngin whn sh caught it, and kpt doubling
itslf up and straightning itslf out again, so that altogthr, for
th first minut or two, it was as much as sh could do to hold it.

As soon as sh had mad out th propr way of nursing it, (which was to
twist it up into a sort of knot, and thn kp tight hold of its right
ar and lft foot, so as to prvnt its undoing itslf,) sh carrid it
out into th opn air. “If I don’t tak this child away with m,”
thought Alic, “thy’r sur to kill it in a day or two: wouldn’t it b
murdr to lav it bhind?” Sh said th last words out loud, and th
littl thing gruntd in rply (it had lft off snzing by this tim).
“Don’t grunt,” said Alic; “that’s not at all a propr way of
xprssing yourslf.”

Th baby gruntd again, and Alic lookd vry anxiously into its fac
to s what was th mattr with it. Thr could b no doubt that it had
a _vry_ turn-up nos, much mor lik a snout than a ral nos; also
its ys wr gtting xtrmly small for a baby: altogthr Alic did
not lik th look of th thing at all. “But prhaps it was only
sobbing,” sh thought, and lookd into its ys again, to s if thr
wr any tars.

No, thr wr no tars. “If you’r going to turn into a pig, my dar,”
said Alic, sriously, “I’ll hav nothing mor to do with you. Mind
now!” Th poor littl thing sobbd again (or gruntd, it was impossibl
to say which), and thy wnt on for som whil in silnc.

Alic was just bginning to think to hrslf, “Now, what am I to do
with this cratur whn I gt it hom?” whn it gruntd again, so
violntly, that sh lookd down into its fac in som alarm. This tim
thr could b _no_ mistak about it: it was nithr mor nor lss than
a pig, and sh flt that it would b quit absurd for hr to carry it
furthr.

So sh st th littl cratur down, and flt quit rlivd to s it
trot away quitly into th wood. “If it had grown up,” sh said to
hrslf, “it would hav mad a dradfully ugly child: but it maks
rathr a handsom pig, I think.” And sh bgan thinking ovr othr
childrn sh knw, who might do vry wll as pigs, and was just saying
to hrslf, “if on only knw th right way to chang thm—” whn sh
was a littl startld by sing th Chshir Cat sitting on a bough of
a tr a fw yards off.

Th Cat only grinnd whn it saw Alic. It lookd good-naturd, sh
thought: still it had _vry_ long claws and a grat many tth, so sh
flt that it ought to b tratd with rspct.

“Chshir Puss,” sh bgan, rathr timidly, as sh did not at all know
whthr it would lik th nam: howvr, it only grinnd a littl
widr. “Com, it’s plasd so far,” thought Alic, and sh wnt on.
“Would you tll m, plas, which way I ought to go from hr?”

“That dpnds a good dal on whr you want to gt to,” said th Cat.

“I don’t much car whr—” said Alic.

“Thn it dosn’t mattr which way you go,” said th Cat.

“—so long as I gt _somwhr_,” Alic addd as an xplanation.

“Oh, you’r sur to do that,” said th Cat, “if you only walk long
nough.”

Alic flt that this could not b dnid, so sh trid anothr
qustion. “What sort of popl liv about hr?”

“In _that_ dirction,” th Cat said, waving its right paw round, “livs
a Hattr: and in _that_ dirction,” waving th othr paw, “livs a
March Har. Visit ithr you lik: thy’r both mad.”

“But I don’t want to go among mad popl,” Alic rmarkd.

“Oh, you can’t hlp that,” said th Cat: “w’r all mad hr. I’m mad.
You’r mad.”

“How do you know I’m mad?” said Alic.

“You must b,” said th Cat, “or you wouldn’t hav com hr.”

Alic didn’t think that provd it at all; howvr, sh wnt on “And how
do you know that you’r mad?”

“To bgin with,” said th Cat, “a dog’s not mad. You grant that?”

“I suppos so,” said Alic.

“Wll, thn,” th Cat wnt on, “you s, a dog growls whn it’s angry,
and wags its tail whn it’s plasd. Now _I_ growl whn I’m plasd,
and wag my tail whn I’m angry. Thrfor I’m mad.”

“_I_ call it purring, not growling,” said Alic.

“Call it what you lik,” said th Cat. “Do you play croqut with th
Qun to-day?”

“I should lik it vry much,” said Alic, “but I havn’t bn invitd
yt.”

“You’ll s m thr,” said th Cat, and vanishd.

Alic was not much surprisd at this, sh was gtting so usd to qur
things happning. Whil sh was looking at th plac whr it had bn,
it suddnly appard again.

“By-th-by, what bcam of th baby?” said th Cat. “I’d narly
forgottn to ask.”

“It turnd into a pig,” Alic quitly said, just as if it had com back
in a natural way.

“I thought it would,” said th Cat, and vanishd again.

Alic waitd a littl, half xpcting to s it again, but it did not
appar, and aftr a minut or two sh walkd on in th dirction in
which th March Har was said to liv. “I’v sn hattrs bfor,” sh
said to hrslf; “th March Har will b much th most intrsting, and
prhaps as this is May it won’t b raving mad—at last not so mad as it
was in March.” As sh said this, sh lookd up, and thr was th Cat
again, sitting on a branch of a tr.

“Did you say pig, or fig?” said th Cat.

“I said pig,” rplid Alic; “and I wish you wouldn’t kp apparing
and vanishing so suddnly: you mak on quit giddy.”

“All right,” said th Cat; and this tim it vanishd quit slowly,
bginning with th nd of th tail, and nding with th grin, which
rmaind som tim aftr th rst of it had gon.

“Wll! I’v oftn sn a cat without a grin,” thought Alic; “but a
grin without a cat! It’s th most curious thing I vr saw in my lif!”

Sh had not gon much farthr bfor sh cam in sight of th hous of
th March Har: sh thought it must b th right hous, bcaus th
chimnys wr shapd lik ars and th roof was thatchd with fur. It
was so larg a hous, that sh did not lik to go narr till sh had
nibbld som mor of th lfthand bit of mushroom, and raisd hrslf
to about two ft high: vn thn sh walkd up towards it rathr
timidly, saying to hrslf “Suppos it should b raving mad aftr all!
I almost wish I’d gon to s th Hattr instad!”




CHAPTER VII.
A Mad Ta-Party


Thr was a tabl st out undr a tr in front of th hous, and th
March Har and th Hattr wr having ta at it: a Dormous was sitting
btwn thm, fast aslp, and th othr two wr using it as a
cushion, rsting thir lbows on it, and talking ovr its had. “Vry
uncomfortabl for th Dormous,” thought Alic; “only, as it’s aslp,
I suppos it dosn’t mind.”

Th tabl was a larg on, but th thr wr all crowdd togthr at
on cornr of it: “No room! No room!” thy crid out whn thy saw
Alic coming. “Thr’s _plnty_ of room!” said Alic indignantly, and
sh sat down in a larg arm-chair at on nd of th tabl.

“Hav som win,” th March Har said in an ncouraging ton.

Alic lookd all round th tabl, but thr was nothing on it but ta.
“I don’t s any win,” sh rmarkd.

“Thr isn’t any,” said th March Har.

“Thn it wasn’t vry civil of you to offr it,” said Alic angrily.

“It wasn’t vry civil of you to sit down without bing invitd,” said
th March Har.

“I didn’t know it was _your_ tabl,” said Alic; “it’s laid for a grat
many mor than thr.”

“Your hair wants cutting,” said th Hattr. H had bn looking at
Alic for som tim with grat curiosity, and this was his first
spch.

“You should larn not to mak prsonal rmarks,” Alic said with som
svrity; “it’s vry rud.”

Th Hattr opnd his ys vry wid on haring this; but all h _said_
was, “Why is a ravn lik a writing-dsk?”

“Com, w shall hav som fun now!” thought Alic. “I’m glad thy’v
bgun asking riddls.—I bliv I can guss that,” sh addd aloud.

“Do you man that you think you can find out th answr to it?” said
th March Har.

“Exactly so,” said Alic.

“Thn you should say what you man,” th March Har wnt on.

“I do,” Alic hastily rplid; “at last—at last I man what I
say—that’s th sam thing, you know.”

“Not th sam thing a bit!” said th Hattr. “You might just as wll
say that ‘I s what I at’ is th sam thing as ‘I at what I s’!”

“You might just as wll say,” addd th March Har, “that ‘I lik what
I gt’ is th sam thing as ‘I gt what I lik’!”

“You might just as wll say,” addd th Dormous, who smd to b
talking in his slp, “that ‘I brath whn I slp’ is th sam thing
as ‘I slp whn I brath’!”

“It _is_ th sam thing with you,” said th Hattr, and hr th
convrsation droppd, and th party sat silnt for a minut, whil
Alic thought ovr all sh could rmmbr about ravns and
writing-dsks, which wasn’t much.

Th Hattr was th first to brak th silnc. “What day of th month
is it?” h said, turning to Alic: h had takn his watch out of his
pockt, and was looking at it unasily, shaking it vry now and thn,
and holding it to his ar.

Alic considrd a littl, and thn said “Th fourth.”

“Two days wrong!” sighd th Hattr. “I told you buttr wouldn’t suit
th works!” h addd looking angrily at th March Har.

“It was th _bst_ buttr,” th March Har mkly rplid.

“Ys, but som crumbs must hav got in as wll,” th Hattr grumbld:
“you shouldn’t hav put it in with th brad-knif.”

Th March Har took th watch and lookd at it gloomily: thn h dippd
it into his cup of ta, and lookd at it again: but h could think of
nothing bttr to say than his first rmark, “It was th _bst_ buttr,
you know.”

Alic had bn looking ovr his shouldr with som curiosity. “What a
funny watch!” sh rmarkd. “It tlls th day of th month, and dosn’t
tll what o’clock it is!”

“Why should it?” muttrd th Hattr. “Dos _your_ watch tll you what
yar it is?”

“Of cours not,” Alic rplid vry radily: “but that’s bcaus it
stays th sam yar for such a long tim togthr.”

“Which is just th cas with _min_,” said th Hattr.

Alic flt dradfully puzzld. Th Hattr’s rmark smd to hav no
sort of maning in it, and yt it was crtainly English. “I don’t quit
undrstand you,” sh said, as politly as sh could.

“Th Dormous is aslp again,” said th Hattr, and h pourd a littl
hot ta upon its nos.

Th Dormous shook its had impatintly, and said, without opning its
ys, “Of cours, of cours; just what I was going to rmark myslf.”

“Hav you gussd th riddl yt?” th Hattr said, turning to Alic
again.

“No, I giv it up,” Alic rplid: “what’s th answr?”

“I havn’t th slightst ida,” said th Hattr.

“Nor I,” said th March Har.

Alic sighd warily. “I think you might do somthing bttr with th
tim,” sh said, “than wast it in asking riddls that hav no
answrs.”

“If you knw Tim as wll as I do,” said th Hattr, “you wouldn’t talk
about wasting _it_. It’s _him_.”

“I don’t know what you man,” said Alic.

“Of cours you don’t!” th Hattr said, tossing his had
contmptuously. “I dar say you nvr vn spok to Tim!”

“Prhaps not,” Alic cautiously rplid: “but I know I hav to bat
tim whn I larn music.”

“Ah! that accounts for it,” said th Hattr. “H won’t stand bating.
Now, if you only kpt on good trms with him, h’d do almost anything
you likd with th clock. For instanc, suppos it wr nin o’clock in
th morning, just tim to bgin lssons: you’d only hav to whispr a
hint to Tim, and round gos th clock in a twinkling! Half-past on,
tim for dinnr!”

(“I only wish it was,” th March Har said to itslf in a whispr.)

“That would b grand, crtainly,” said Alic thoughtfully: “but thn—I
shouldn’t b hungry for it, you know.”

“Not at first, prhaps,” said th Hattr: “but you could kp it to
half-past on as long as you likd.”

“Is that th way _you_ manag?” Alic askd.

Th Hattr shook his had mournfully. “Not I!” h rplid. “W
quarrlld last March—just bfor _h_ wnt mad, you know—” (pointing
with his ta spoon at th March Har,) “—it was at th grat concrt
givn by th Qun of Harts, and I had to sing

‘Twinkl, twinkl, littl bat!
How I wondr what you’r at!’


You know th song, prhaps?”

“I’v hard somthing lik it,” said Alic.

“It gos on, you know,” th Hattr continud, “in this way:—

‘Up abov th world you fly,
Lik a ta-tray in th sky.
                    Twinkl, twinkl—’”


Hr th Dormous shook itslf, and bgan singing in its slp
“_Twinkl, twinkl, twinkl, twinkl_—” and wnt on so long that thy
had to pinch it to mak it stop.

“Wll, I’d hardly finishd th first vrs,” said th Hattr, “whn th
Qun jumpd up and bawld out, ‘H’s murdring th tim! Off with his
had!’”

“How dradfully savag!” xclaimd Alic.

“And vr sinc that,” th Hattr wnt on in a mournful ton, “h won’t
do a thing I ask! It’s always six o’clock now.”

A bright ida cam into Alic’s had. “Is that th rason so many
ta-things ar put out hr?” sh askd.

“Ys, that’s it,” said th Hattr with a sigh: “it’s always ta-tim,
and w’v no tim to wash th things btwn whils.”

“Thn you kp moving round, I suppos?” said Alic.

“Exactly so,” said th Hattr: “as th things gt usd up.”

“But what happns whn you com to th bginning again?” Alic vnturd
to ask.

“Suppos w chang th subjct,” th March Har intrruptd, yawning.
“I’m gtting tird of this. I vot th young lady tlls us a story.”

“I’m afraid I don’t know on,” said Alic, rathr alarmd at th
proposal.

“Thn th Dormous shall!” thy both crid. “Wak up, Dormous!” And
thy pinchd it on both sids at onc.

Th Dormous slowly opnd his ys. “I wasn’t aslp,” h said in a
hoars, fbl voic: “I hard vry word you fllows wr saying.”

“Tll us a story!” said th March Har.

“Ys, plas do!” pladd Alic.

“And b quick about it,” addd th Hattr, “or you’ll b aslp again
bfor it’s don.”

“Onc upon a tim thr wr thr littl sistrs,” th Dormous bgan
in a grat hurry; “and thir nams wr Elsi, Laci, and Tilli; and
thy livd at th bottom of a wll—”

“What did thy liv on?” said Alic, who always took a grat intrst
in qustions of ating and drinking.

“Thy livd on tracl,” said th Dormous, aftr thinking a minut or
two.

“Thy couldn’t hav don that, you know,” Alic gntly rmarkd;
“thy’d hav bn ill.”

“So thy wr,” said th Dormous; “_vry_ ill.”

Alic trid to fancy to hrslf what such an xtraordinary ways of
living would b lik, but it puzzld hr too much, so sh wnt on: “But
why did thy liv at th bottom of a wll?”

“Tak som mor ta,” th March Har said to Alic, vry arnstly.

“I’v had nothing yt,” Alic rplid in an offndd ton, “so I can’t
tak mor.”

“You man you can’t tak _lss_,” said th Hattr: “it’s vry asy to
tak _mor_ than nothing.”

“Nobody askd _your_ opinion,” said Alic.

“Who’s making prsonal rmarks now?” th Hattr askd triumphantly.

Alic did not quit know what to say to this: so sh hlpd hrslf to
som ta and brad-and-buttr, and thn turnd to th Dormous, and
rpatd hr qustion. “Why did thy liv at th bottom of a wll?”

Th Dormous again took a minut or two to think about it, and thn
said, “It was a tracl-wll.”

“Thr’s no such thing!” Alic was bginning vry angrily, but th
Hattr and th March Har wnt “Sh! sh!” and th Dormous sulkily
rmarkd, “If you can’t b civil, you’d bttr finish th story for
yourslf.”

“No, plas go on!” Alic said vry humbly; “I won’t intrrupt again. I
dar say thr may b _on_.”

“On, indd!” said th Dormous indignantly. Howvr, h consntd to
go on. “And so ths thr littl sistrs—thy wr larning to draw,
you know—”

“What did thy draw?” said Alic, quit forgtting hr promis.

“Tracl,” said th Dormous, without considring at all this tim.

“I want a clan cup,” intrruptd th Hattr: “lt’s all mov on plac
on.”

H movd on as h spok, and th Dormous followd him: th March Har
movd into th Dormous’s plac, and Alic rathr unwillingly took th
plac of th March Har. Th Hattr was th only on who got any
advantag from th chang: and Alic was a good dal wors off than
bfor, as th March Har had just upst th milk-jug into his plat.

Alic did not wish to offnd th Dormous again, so sh bgan vry
cautiously: “But I don’t undrstand. Whr did thy draw th tracl
from?”

“You can draw watr out of a watr-wll,” said th Hattr; “so I should
think you could draw tracl out of a tracl-wll—h, stupid?”

“But thy wr _in_ th wll,” Alic said to th Dormous, not choosing
to notic this last rmark.

“Of cours thy wr,” said th Dormous; “—wll in.”

This answr so confusd poor Alic, that sh lt th Dormous go on for
som tim without intrrupting it.

“Thy wr larning to draw,” th Dormous wnt on, yawning and rubbing
its ys, for it was gtting vry slpy; “and thy drw all mannr of
things—vrything that bgins with an M—”

“Why with an M?” said Alic.

“Why not?” said th March Har.

Alic was silnt.

Th Dormous had closd its ys by this tim, and was going off into a
doz; but, on bing pinchd by th Hattr, it wok up again with a
littl shrik, and wnt on: “—that bgins with an M, such as
mous-traps, and th moon, and mmory, and muchnss—you know you say
things ar “much of a muchnss”—did you vr s such a thing as a
drawing of a muchnss?”

“Rally, now you ask m,” said Alic, vry much confusd, “I don’t
think—”

“Thn you shouldn’t talk,” said th Hattr.

This pic of rudnss was mor than Alic could bar: sh got up in
grat disgust, and walkd off; th Dormous fll aslp instantly, and
nithr of th othrs took th last notic of hr going, though sh
lookd back onc or twic, half hoping that thy would call aftr hr:
th last tim sh saw thm, thy wr trying to put th Dormous into
th tapot.

“At any rat I’ll nvr go _thr_ again!” said Alic as sh pickd hr
way through th wood. “It’s th stupidst ta-party I vr was at in
all my lif!”

Just as sh said this, sh noticd that on of th trs had a door
lading right into it. “That’s vry curious!” sh thought. “But
vrything’s curious today. I think I may as wll go in at onc.” And
in sh wnt.

Onc mor sh found hrslf in th long hall, and clos to th littl
glass tabl. “Now, I’ll manag bttr this tim,” sh said to hrslf,
and bgan by taking th littl goldn ky, and unlocking th door that
ld into th gardn. Thn sh wnt to work nibbling at th mushroom
(sh had kpt a pic of it in hr pockt) till sh was about a foot
high: thn sh walkd down th littl passag: and _thn_—sh found
hrslf at last in th bautiful gardn, among th bright flowr-bds
and th cool fountains.




CHAPTER VIII.
Th Qun’s Croqut-Ground


A larg ros-tr stood nar th ntranc of th gardn: th ross
growing on it wr whit, but thr wr thr gardnrs at it, busily
painting thm rd. Alic thought this a vry curious thing, and sh
wnt narr to watch thm, and just as sh cam up to thm sh hard
on of thm say, “Look out now, Fiv! Don’t go splashing paint ovr m
lik that!”

“I couldn’t hlp it,” said Fiv, in a sulky ton; “Svn joggd my
lbow.”

On which Svn lookd up and said, “That’s right, Fiv! Always lay th
blam on othrs!”

“_You’d_ bttr not talk!” said Fiv. “I hard th Qun say only
ystrday you dsrvd to b bhadd!”

“What for?” said th on who had spokn first.

“That’s non of _your_ businss, Two!” said Svn.

“Ys, it _is_ his businss!” said Fiv, “and I’ll tll him—it was for
bringing th cook tulip-roots instad of onions.”

Svn flung down his brush, and had just bgun “Wll, of all th unjust
things—” whn his y chancd to fall upon Alic, as sh stood watching
thm, and h chckd himslf suddnly: th othrs lookd round also,
and all of thm bowd low.

“Would you tll m,” said Alic, a littl timidly, “why you ar
painting thos ross?”

Fiv and Svn said nothing, but lookd at Two. Two bgan in a low
voic, “Why th fact is, you s, Miss, this hr ought to hav bn a
_rd_ ros-tr, and w put a whit on in by mistak; and if th Qun
was to find it out, w should all hav our hads cut off, you know. So
you s, Miss, w’r doing our bst, afor sh coms, to—” At this
momnt Fiv, who had bn anxiously looking across th gardn, calld
out “Th Qun! Th Qun!” and th thr gardnrs instantly thrw
thmslvs flat upon thir facs. Thr was a sound of many footstps,
and Alic lookd round, agr to s th Qun.

First cam tn soldirs carrying clubs; ths wr all shapd lik th
thr gardnrs, oblong and flat, with thir hands and ft at th
cornrs: nxt th tn courtirs; ths wr ornamntd all ovr with
diamonds, and walkd two and two, as th soldirs did. Aftr ths cam
th royal childrn; thr wr tn of thm, and th littl dars cam
jumping mrrily along hand in hand, in coupls: thy wr all
ornamntd with harts. Nxt cam th gusts, mostly Kings and Quns,
and among thm Alic rcognisd th Whit Rabbit: it was talking in a
hurrid nrvous mannr, smiling at vrything that was said, and wnt
by without noticing hr. Thn followd th Knav of Harts, carrying
th King’s crown on a crimson vlvt cushion; and, last of all this
grand procssion, cam THE KING AND QUEEN OF HEARTS.

Alic was rathr doubtful whthr sh ought not to li down on hr fac
lik th thr gardnrs, but sh could not rmmbr vr having hard
of such a rul at procssions; “and bsids, what would b th us of a
procssion,” thought sh, “if popl had all to li down upon thir
facs, so that thy couldn’t s it?” So sh stood still whr sh was,
and waitd.

Whn th procssion cam opposit to Alic, thy all stoppd and lookd
at hr, and th Qun said svrly “Who is this?” Sh said it to th
Knav of Harts, who only bowd and smild in rply.

“Idiot!” said th Qun, tossing hr had impatintly; and, turning to
Alic, sh wnt on, “What’s your nam, child?”

“My nam is Alic, so plas your Majsty,” said Alic vry politly;
but sh addd, to hrslf, “Why, thy’r only a pack of cards, aftr
all. I ndn’t b afraid of thm!”

“And who ar _ths?_” said th Qun, pointing to th thr gardnrs
who wr lying round th ros-tr; for, you s, as thy wr lying on
thir facs, and th pattrn on thir backs was th sam as th rst of
th pack, sh could not tll whthr thy wr gardnrs, or soldirs,
or courtirs, or thr of hr own childrn.

“How should _I_ know?” said Alic, surprisd at hr own courag. “It’s
no businss of _min_.”

Th Qun turnd crimson with fury, and, aftr glaring at hr for a
momnt lik a wild bast, scramd “Off with hr had! Off—”

“Nonsns!” said Alic, vry loudly and dciddly, and th Qun was
silnt.

Th King laid his hand upon hr arm, and timidly said “Considr, my
dar: sh is only a child!”

Th Qun turnd angrily away from him, and said to th Knav “Turn
thm ovr!”

Th Knav did so, vry carfully, with on foot.

“Gt up!” said th Qun, in a shrill, loud voic, and th thr
gardnrs instantly jumpd up, and bgan bowing to th King, th Qun,
th royal childrn, and vrybody ls.

“Lav off that!” scramd th Qun. “You mak m giddy.” And thn,
turning to th ros-tr, sh wnt on, “What _hav_ you bn doing
hr?”

“May it plas your Majsty,” said Two, in a vry humbl ton, going
down on on kn as h spok, “w wr trying—”

“_I_ s!” said th Qun, who had manwhil bn xamining th ross.
“Off with thir hads!” and th procssion movd on, thr of th
soldirs rmaining bhind to xcut th unfortunat gardnrs, who ran
to Alic for protction.

“You shan’t b bhadd!” said Alic, and sh put thm into a larg
flowr-pot that stood nar. Th thr soldirs wandrd about for a
minut or two, looking for thm, and thn quitly marchd off aftr th
othrs.

“Ar thir hads off?” shoutd th Qun.

“Thir hads ar gon, if it plas your Majsty!” th soldirs shoutd
in rply.

“That’s right!” shoutd th Qun. “Can you play croqut?”

Th soldirs wr silnt, and lookd at Alic, as th qustion was
vidntly mant for hr.

“Ys!” shoutd Alic.

“Com on, thn!” roard th Qun, and Alic joind th procssion,
wondring vry much what would happn nxt.

“It’s—it’s a vry fin day!” said a timid voic at hr sid. Sh was
walking by th Whit Rabbit, who was pping anxiously into hr fac.

“Vry,” said Alic: “—whr’s th Duchss?”

“Hush! Hush!” said th Rabbit in a low, hurrid ton. H lookd
anxiously ovr his shouldr as h spok, and thn raisd himslf upon
tipto, put his mouth clos to hr ar, and whisprd “Sh’s undr
sntnc of xcution.”

“What for?” said Alic.

“Did you say ‘What a pity!’?” th Rabbit askd.

“No, I didn’t,” said Alic: “I don’t think it’s at all a pity. I said
‘What for?’”

“Sh boxd th Qun’s ars—” th Rabbit bgan. Alic gav a littl
scram of laughtr. “Oh, hush!” th Rabbit whisprd in a frightnd
ton. “Th Qun will har you! You s, sh cam rathr lat, and th
Qun said—”

“Gt to your placs!” shoutd th Qun in a voic of thundr, and
popl bgan running about in all dirctions, tumbling up against ach
othr; howvr, thy got sttld down in a minut or two, and th gam
bgan. Alic thought sh had nvr sn such a curious croqut-ground
in hr lif; it was all ridgs and furrows; th balls wr liv
hdghogs, th mallts liv flamingos, and th soldirs had to doubl
thmslvs up and to stand on thir hands and ft, to mak th archs.

Th chif difficulty Alic found at first was in managing hr flamingo:
sh succdd in gtting its body tuckd away, comfortably nough,
undr hr arm, with its lgs hanging down, but gnrally, just as sh
had got its nck nicly straightnd out, and was going to giv th
hdghog a blow with its had, it _would_ twist itslf round and look
up in hr fac, with such a puzzld xprssion that sh could not hlp
bursting out laughing: and whn sh had got its had down, and was
going to bgin again, it was vry provoking to find that th hdghog
had unrolld itslf, and was in th act of crawling away: bsids all
this, thr was gnrally a ridg or furrow in th way whrvr sh
wantd to snd th hdghog to, and, as th doubld-up soldirs wr
always gtting up and walking off to othr parts of th ground, Alic
soon cam to th conclusion that it was a vry difficult gam indd.

Th playrs all playd at onc without waiting for turns, quarrlling
all th whil, and fighting for th hdghogs; and in a vry short tim
th Qun was in a furious passion, and wnt stamping about, and
shouting “Off with his had!” or “Off with hr had!” about onc in a
minut.

Alic bgan to fl vry unasy: to b sur, sh had not as yt had any
disput with th Qun, but sh knw that it might happn any minut,
“and thn,” thought sh, “what would bcom of m? Thy’r dradfully
fond of bhading popl hr; th grat wondr is, that thr’s any
on lft aliv!”

Sh was looking about for som way of scap, and wondring whthr sh
could gt away without bing sn, whn sh noticd a curious
apparanc in th air: it puzzld hr vry much at first, but, aftr
watching it a minut or two, sh mad it out to b a grin, and sh said
to hrslf “It’s th Chshir Cat: now I shall hav sombody to talk
to.”

“How ar you gtting on?” said th Cat, as soon as thr was mouth
nough for it to spak with.

Alic waitd till th ys appard, and thn noddd. “It’s no us
spaking to it,” sh thought, “till its ars hav com, or at last on
of thm.” In anothr minut th whol had appard, and thn Alic put
down hr flamingo, and bgan an account of th gam, fling vry glad
sh had somon to listn to hr. Th Cat smd to think that thr
was nough of it now in sight, and no mor of it appard.

“I don’t think thy play at all fairly,” Alic bgan, in rathr a
complaining ton, “and thy all quarrl so dradfully on can’t har
onslf spak—and thy don’t sm to hav any ruls in particular; at
last, if thr ar, nobody attnds to thm—and you’v no ida how
confusing it is all th things bing aliv; for instanc, thr’s th
arch I’v got to go through nxt walking about at th othr nd of th
ground—and I should hav croqutd th Qun’s hdghog just now, only
it ran away whn it saw min coming!”

“How do you lik th Qun?” said th Cat in a low voic.

“Not at all,” said Alic: “sh’s so xtrmly—” Just thn sh noticd
that th Qun was clos bhind hr, listning: so sh wnt on,
“—likly to win, that it’s hardly worth whil finishing th gam.”

Th Qun smild and passd on.

“Who _ar_ you talking to?” said th King, going up to Alic, and
looking at th Cat’s had with grat curiosity.

“It’s a frind of min—a Chshir Cat,” said Alic: “allow m to
introduc it.”

“I don’t lik th look of it at all,” said th King: “howvr, it may
kiss my hand if it liks.”

“I’d rathr not,” th Cat rmarkd.

“Don’t b imprtinnt,” said th King, “and don’t look at m lik
that!” H got bhind Alic as h spok.

“A cat may look at a king,” said Alic. “I’v rad that in som book,
but I don’t rmmbr whr.”

“Wll, it must b rmovd,” said th King vry dciddly, and h calld
th Qun, who was passing at th momnt, “My dar! I wish you would
hav this cat rmovd!”

Th Qun had only on way of sttling all difficultis, grat or
small. “Off with his had!” sh said, without vn looking round.

“I’ll ftch th xcutionr myslf,” said th King agrly, and h
hurrid off.

Alic thought sh might as wll go back, and s how th gam was going
on, as sh hard th Qun’s voic in th distanc, scraming with
passion. Sh had alrady hard hr sntnc thr of th playrs to b
xcutd for having missd thir turns, and sh did not lik th look
of things at all, as th gam was in such confusion that sh nvr knw
whthr it was hr turn or not. So sh wnt in sarch of hr hdghog.

Th hdghog was ngagd in a fight with anothr hdghog, which smd
to Alic an xcllnt opportunity for croquting on of thm with th
othr: th only difficulty was, that hr flamingo was gon across to
th othr sid of th gardn, whr Alic could s it trying in a
hlplss sort of way to fly up into a tr.

By th tim sh had caught th flamingo and brought it back, th fight
was ovr, and both th hdghogs wr out of sight: “but it dosn’t
mattr much,” thought Alic, “as all th archs ar gon from this sid
of th ground.” So sh tuckd it away undr hr arm, that it might not
scap again, and wnt back for a littl mor convrsation with hr
frind.

Whn sh got back to th Chshir Cat, sh was surprisd to find quit
a larg crowd collctd round it: thr was a disput going on btwn
th xcutionr, th King, and th Qun, who wr all talking at onc,
whil all th rst wr quit silnt, and lookd vry uncomfortabl.

Th momnt Alic appard, sh was appald to by all thr to sttl
th qustion, and thy rpatd thir argumnts to hr, though, as thy
all spok at onc, sh found it vry hard indd to mak out xactly
what thy said.

Th xcutionr’s argumnt was, that you couldn’t cut off a had unlss
thr was a body to cut it off from: that h had nvr had to do such a
thing bfor, and h wasn’t going to bgin at _his_ tim of lif.

Th King’s argumnt was, that anything that had a had could b
bhadd, and that you wrn’t to talk nonsns.

Th Qun’s argumnt was, that if somthing wasn’t don about it in
lss than no tim sh’d hav vrybody xcutd, all round. (It was
this last rmark that had mad th whol party look so grav and
anxious.)

Alic could think of nothing ls to say but “It blongs to th
Duchss: you’d bttr ask _hr_ about it.”

“Sh’s in prison,” th Qun said to th xcutionr: “ftch hr hr.”
And th xcutionr wnt off lik an arrow.

Th Cat’s had bgan fading away th momnt h was gon, and, by th
tim h had com back with th Duchss, it had ntirly disappard; so
th King and th xcutionr ran wildly up and down looking for it,
whil th rst of th party wnt back to th gam.




CHAPTER IX.
Th Mock Turtl’s Story


“You can’t think how glad I am to s you again, you dar old thing!”
said th Duchss, as sh tuckd hr arm affctionatly into Alic’s,
and thy walkd off togthr.

Alic was vry glad to find hr in such a plasant tmpr, and thought
to hrslf that prhaps it was only th pppr that had mad hr so
savag whn thy mt in th kitchn.

“Whn _I’m_ a Duchss,” sh said to hrslf, (not in a vry hopful
ton though), “I won’t hav any pppr in my kitchn _at all_. Soup
dos vry wll without—Mayb it’s always pppr that maks popl
hot-tmprd,” sh wnt on, vry much plasd at having found out a nw
kind of rul, “and vingar that maks thm sour—and camomil that maks
thm bittr—and—and barly-sugar and such things that mak childrn
swt-tmprd. I only wish popl knw _that_: thn thy wouldn’t b
so stingy about it, you know—”

Sh had quit forgottn th Duchss by this tim, and was a littl
startld whn sh hard hr voic clos to hr ar. “You’r thinking
about somthing, my dar, and that maks you forgt to talk. I can’t
tll you just now what th moral of that is, but I shall rmmbr it in
a bit.”

“Prhaps it hasn’t on,” Alic vnturd to rmark.

“Tut, tut, child!” said th Duchss. “Evrything’s got a moral, if only
you can find it.” And sh squzd hrslf up closr to Alic’s sid as
sh spok.

Alic did not much lik kping so clos to hr: first, bcaus th
Duchss was _vry_ ugly; and scondly, bcaus sh was xactly th
right hight to rst hr chin upon Alic’s shouldr, and it was an
uncomfortably sharp chin. Howvr, sh did not lik to b rud, so sh
bor it as wll as sh could.

“Th gam’s going on rathr bttr now,” sh said, by way of kping up
th convrsation a littl.

“’Tis so,” said th Duchss: “and th moral of that is—‘Oh, ’tis lov,
’tis lov, that maks th world go round!’”

“Sombody said,” Alic whisprd, “that it’s don by vrybody minding
thir own businss!”

“Ah, wll! It mans much th sam thing,” said th Duchss, digging hr
sharp littl chin into Alic’s shouldr as sh addd, “and th moral of
_that_ is—‘Tak car of th sns, and th sounds will tak car of
thmslvs.’”

“How fond sh is of finding morals in things!” Alic thought to
hrslf.

“I dar say you’r wondring why I don’t put my arm round your waist,”
th Duchss said aftr a paus: “th rason is, that I’m doubtful about
th tmpr of your flamingo. Shall I try th xprimnt?”

“H might bit,” Alic cautiously rplid, not fling at all anxious
to hav th xprimnt trid.

“Vry tru,” said th Duchss: “flamingos and mustard both bit. And
th moral of that is—‘Birds of a fathr flock togthr.’”

“Only mustard isn’t a bird,” Alic rmarkd.

“Right, as usual,” said th Duchss: “what a clar way you hav of
putting things!”

“It’s a minral, I _think_,” said Alic.

“Of cours it is,” said th Duchss, who smd rady to agr to
vrything that Alic said; “thr’s a larg mustard-min nar hr.
And th moral of that is—‘Th mor thr is of min, th lss thr is
of yours.’”

“Oh, I know!” xclaimd Alic, who had not attndd to this last
rmark, “it’s a vgtabl. It dosn’t look lik on, but it is.”

“I quit agr with you,” said th Duchss; “and th moral of that
is—‘B what you would sm to b’—or if you’d lik it put mor
simply—‘Nvr imagin yourslf not to b othrwis than what it might
appar to othrs that what you wr or might hav bn was not
othrwis than what you had bn would hav appard to thm to b
othrwis.’”

“I think I should undrstand that bttr,” Alic said vry politly,
“if I had it writtn down: but I can’t quit follow it as you say it.”

“That’s nothing to what I could say if I chos,” th Duchss rplid,
in a plasd ton.

“Pray don’t troubl yourslf to say it any longr than that,” said
Alic.

“Oh, don’t talk about troubl!” said th Duchss. “I mak you a prsnt
of vrything I’v said as yt.”

“A chap sort of prsnt!” thought Alic. “I’m glad thy don’t giv
birthday prsnts lik that!” But sh did not vntur to say it out
loud.

“Thinking again?” th Duchss askd, with anothr dig of hr sharp
littl chin.

“I’v a right to think,” said Alic sharply, for sh was bginning to
fl a littl worrid.

“Just about as much right,” said th Duchss, “as pigs hav to fly; and
th m—”

But hr, to Alic’s grat surpris, th Duchss’s voic did away,
vn in th middl of hr favourit word ‘moral,’ and th arm that was
linkd into hrs bgan to trmbl. Alic lookd up, and thr stood th
Qun in front of thm, with hr arms foldd, frowning lik a
thundrstorm.

“A fin day, your Majsty!” th Duchss bgan in a low, wak voic.

“Now, I giv you fair warning,” shoutd th Qun, stamping on th
ground as sh spok; “ithr you or your had must b off, and that in
about half no tim! Tak your choic!”

Th Duchss took hr choic, and was gon in a momnt.

“Lt’s go on with th gam,” th Qun said to Alic; and Alic was too
much frightnd to say a word, but slowly followd hr back to th
croqut-ground.

Th othr gusts had takn advantag of th Qun’s absnc, and wr
rsting in th shad: howvr, th momnt thy saw hr, thy hurrid
back to th gam, th Qun mrly rmarking that a momnt’s dlay
would cost thm thir livs.

All th tim thy wr playing th Qun nvr lft off quarrlling
with th othr playrs, and shouting “Off with his had!” or “Off with
hr had!” Thos whom sh sntncd wr takn into custody by th
soldirs, who of cours had to lav off bing archs to do this, so
that by th nd of half an hour or so thr wr no archs lft, and
all th playrs, xcpt th King, th Qun, and Alic, wr in custody
and undr sntnc of xcution.

Thn th Qun lft off, quit out of brath, and said to Alic, “Hav
you sn th Mock Turtl yt?”

“No,” said Alic. “I don’t vn know what a Mock Turtl is.”

“It’s th thing Mock Turtl Soup is mad from,” said th Qun.

“I nvr saw on, or hard of on,” said Alic.

“Com on, thn,” said th Qun, “and h shall tll you his history,”

As thy walkd off togthr, Alic hard th King say in a low voic,
to th company gnrally, “You ar all pardond.” “Com, _that’s_ a
good thing!” sh said to hrslf, for sh had flt quit unhappy at th
numbr of xcutions th Qun had ordrd.

Thy vry soon cam upon a Gryphon, lying fast aslp in th sun. (If
you don’t know what a Gryphon is, look at th pictur.) “Up, lazy
thing!” said th Qun, “and tak this young lady to s th Mock
Turtl, and to har his history. I must go back and s aftr som
xcutions I hav ordrd;” and sh walkd off, laving Alic alon
with th Gryphon. Alic did not quit lik th look of th cratur,
but on th whol sh thought it would b quit as saf to stay with it
as to go aftr that savag Qun: so sh waitd.

Th Gryphon sat up and rubbd its ys: thn it watchd th Qun till
sh was out of sight: thn it chuckld. “What fun!” said th Gryphon,
half to itslf, half to Alic.

“What _is_ th fun?” said Alic.

“Why, _sh_,” said th Gryphon. “It’s all hr fancy, that: thy nvr
xcuts nobody, you know. Com on!”

“Evrybody says ‘com on!’ hr,” thought Alic, as sh wnt slowly
aftr it: “I nvr was so ordrd about in all my lif, nvr!”

Thy had not gon far bfor thy saw th Mock Turtl in th distanc,
sitting sad and lonly on a littl ldg of rock, and, as thy cam
narr, Alic could har him sighing as if his hart would brak. Sh
pitid him dply. “What is his sorrow?” sh askd th Gryphon, and th
Gryphon answrd, vry narly in th sam words as bfor, “It’s all
his fancy, that: h hasn’t got no sorrow, you know. Com on!”

So thy wnt up to th Mock Turtl, who lookd at thm with larg ys
full of tars, but said nothing.

“This hr young lady,” said th Gryphon, “sh wants for to know your
history, sh do.”

“I’ll tll it hr,” said th Mock Turtl in a dp, hollow ton: “sit
down, both of you, and don’t spak a word till I’v finishd.”

So thy sat down, and nobody spok for som minuts. Alic thought to
hrslf, “I don’t s how h can _vr_ finish, if h dosn’t bgin.”
But sh waitd patintly.

“Onc,” said th Mock Turtl at last, with a dp sigh, “I was a ral
Turtl.”

Ths words wr followd by a vry long silnc, brokn only by an
occasional xclamation of “Hjckrrh!” from th Gryphon, and th constant
havy sobbing of th Mock Turtl. Alic was vry narly gtting up and
saying, “Thank you, sir, for your intrsting story,” but sh could not
hlp thinking thr _must_ b mor to com, so sh sat still and said
nothing.

“Whn w wr littl,” th Mock Turtl wnt on at last, mor calmly,
though still sobbing a littl now and thn, “w wnt to school in th
sa. Th mastr was an old Turtl—w usd to call him Tortois—”

“Why did you call him Tortois, if h wasn’t on?” Alic askd.

“W calld him Tortois bcaus h taught us,” said th Mock Turtl
angrily: “rally you ar vry dull!”

“You ought to b ashamd of yourslf for asking such a simpl
qustion,” addd th Gryphon; and thn thy both sat silnt and lookd
at poor Alic, who flt rady to sink into th arth. At last th
Gryphon said to th Mock Turtl, “Driv on, old fllow! Don’t b all
day about it!” and h wnt on in ths words:

“Ys, w wnt to school in th sa, though you mayn’t bliv it—”

“I nvr said I didn’t!” intrruptd Alic.

“You did,” said th Mock Turtl.

“Hold your tongu!” addd th Gryphon, bfor Alic could spak again.
Th Mock Turtl wnt on.

“W had th bst of ducations—in fact, w wnt to school vry day—”

“_I’v_ bn to a day-school, too,” said Alic; “you ndn’t b so
proud as all that.”

“With xtras?” askd th Mock Turtl a littl anxiously.

“Ys,” said Alic, “w larnd Frnch and music.”

“And washing?” said th Mock Turtl.

“Crtainly not!” said Alic indignantly.

“Ah! thn yours wasn’t a rally good school,” said th Mock Turtl in a
ton of grat rlif. “Now at _ours_ thy had at th nd of th bill,
‘Frnch, music, _and washing_—xtra.’”

“You couldn’t hav wantd it much,” said Alic; “living at th bottom
of th sa.”

“I couldn’t afford to larn it.” said th Mock Turtl with a sigh. “I
only took th rgular cours.”

“What was that?” inquird Alic.

“Rling and Writhing, of cours, to bgin with,” th Mock Turtl
rplid; “and thn th diffrnt branchs of Arithmtic—Ambition,
Distraction, Uglification, and Drision.”

“I nvr hard of ‘Uglification,’” Alic vnturd to say. “What is it?”

Th Gryphon liftd up both its paws in surpris. “What! Nvr hard of
uglifying!” it xclaimd. “You know what to bautify is, I suppos?”

“Ys,” said Alic doubtfully: “it mans—to—mak—anything—prttir.”

“Wll, thn,” th Gryphon wnt on, “if you don’t know what to uglify
is, you _ar_ a simplton.”

Alic did not fl ncouragd to ask any mor qustions about it, so
sh turnd to th Mock Turtl, and said “What ls had you to larn?”

“Wll, thr was Mystry,” th Mock Turtl rplid, counting off th
subjcts on his flapprs, “—Mystry, ancint and modrn, with
Saography: thn Drawling—th Drawling-mastr was an old congr-l,
that usd to com onc a wk: _h_ taught us Drawling, Strtching, and
Fainting in Coils.”

“What was _that_ lik?” said Alic.

“Wll, I can’t show it you myslf,” th Mock Turtl said: “I’m too
stiff. And th Gryphon nvr larnt it.”

“Hadn’t tim,” said th Gryphon: “I wnt to th Classics mastr,
though. H was an old crab, _h_ was.”

“I nvr wnt to him,” th Mock Turtl said with a sigh: “h taught
Laughing and Grif, thy usd to say.”

“So h did, so h did,” said th Gryphon, sighing in his turn; and both
craturs hid thir facs in thir paws.

“And how many hours a day did you do lssons?” said Alic, in a hurry
to chang th subjct.

“Tn hours th first day,” said th Mock Turtl: “nin th nxt, and so
on.”

“What a curious plan!” xclaimd Alic.

“That’s th rason thy’r calld lssons,” th Gryphon rmarkd:
“bcaus thy lssn from day to day.”

This was quit a nw ida to Alic, and sh thought it ovr a littl
bfor sh mad hr nxt rmark. “Thn th lvnth day must hav bn
a holiday?”

“Of cours it was,” said th Mock Turtl.

“And how did you manag on th twlfth?” Alic wnt on agrly.

“That’s nough about lssons,” th Gryphon intrruptd in a vry
dcidd ton: “tll hr somthing about th gams now.”




CHAPTER X.
Th Lobstr Quadrill


Th Mock Turtl sighd dply, and drw th back of on flappr across
his ys. H lookd at Alic, and trid to spak, but for a minut or
two sobs chokd his voic. “Sam as if h had a bon in his throat,”
said th Gryphon: and it st to work shaking him and punching him in
th back. At last th Mock Turtl rcovrd his voic, and, with tars
running down his chks, h wnt on again:—

“You may not hav livd much undr th sa—” (“I havn’t,” said
Alic)—“and prhaps you wr nvr vn introducd to a lobstr—”
(Alic bgan to say “I onc tastd—” but chckd hrslf hastily, and
said “No, nvr”) “—so you can hav no ida what a dlightful thing a
Lobstr Quadrill is!”

“No, indd,” said Alic. “What sort of a danc is it?”

“Why,” said th Gryphon, “you first form into a lin along th
sa-shor—”

“Two lins!” crid th Mock Turtl. “Sals, turtls, salmon, and so on;
thn, whn you’v clard all th jlly-fish out of th way—”

“_That_ gnrally taks som tim,” intrruptd th Gryphon.

“—you advanc twic—”

“Each with a lobstr as a partnr!” crid th Gryphon.

“Of cours,” th Mock Turtl said: “advanc twic, st to partnrs—”

“—chang lobstrs, and rtir in sam ordr,” continud th Gryphon.

“Thn, you know,” th Mock Turtl wnt on, “you throw th—”

“Th lobstrs!” shoutd th Gryphon, with a bound into th air.

“—as far out to sa as you can—”

“Swim aftr thm!” scramd th Gryphon.

“Turn a somrsault in th sa!” crid th Mock Turtl, capring wildly
about.

“Chang lobstrs again!” ylld th Gryphon at th top of its voic.

“Back to land again, and that’s all th first figur,” said th Mock
Turtl, suddnly dropping his voic; and th two craturs, who had
bn jumping about lik mad things all this tim, sat down again vry
sadly and quitly, and lookd at Alic.

“It must b a vry prtty danc,” said Alic timidly.

“Would you lik to s a littl of it?” said th Mock Turtl.

“Vry much indd,” said Alic.

“Com, lt’s try th first figur!” said th Mock Turtl to th
Gryphon. “W can do without lobstrs, you know. Which shall sing?”

“Oh, _you_ sing,” said th Gryphon. “I’v forgottn th words.”

So thy bgan solmnly dancing round and round Alic, vry now and
thn trading on hr tos whn thy passd too clos, and waving thir
forpaws to mark th tim, whil th Mock Turtl sang this, vry slowly
and sadly:—

“Will you walk a littl fastr?” said a whiting to a snail.
“Thr’s a porpois clos bhind us, and h’s trading on my tail.
S how agrly th lobstrs and th turtls all advanc!
Thy ar waiting on th shingl—will you com and join th danc?
Will you, won’t you, will you, won’t you, will you join th danc?
Will you, won’t you, will you, won’t you, won’t you join th danc?

“You can rally hav no notion how dlightful it will b
Whn thy tak us up and throw us, with th lobstrs, out to sa!”
But th snail rplid “Too far, too far!” and gav a look askanc—
Said h thankd th whiting kindly, but h would not join th danc.
Would not, could not, would not, could not, would not join th danc.
Would not, could not, would not, could not, could not join th danc.

“What mattrs it how far w go?” his scaly frind rplid.
“Thr is anothr shor, you know, upon th othr sid.
Th furthr off from England th narr is to Franc—
Thn turn not pal, blovd snail, but com and join th danc.
Will you, won’t you, will you, won’t you, will you join th danc?
Will you, won’t you, will you, won’t you, won’t you join th danc?”


“Thank you, it’s a vry intrsting danc to watch,” said Alic,
fling vry glad that it was ovr at last: “and I do so lik that
curious song about th whiting!”

“Oh, as to th whiting,” said th Mock Turtl, “thy—you’v sn thm,
of cours?”

“Ys,” said Alic, “I’v oftn sn thm at dinn—” sh chckd hrslf
hastily.

“I don’t know whr Dinn may b,” said th Mock Turtl, “but if you’v
sn thm so oftn, of cours you know what thy’r lik.”

“I bliv so,” Alic rplid thoughtfully. “Thy hav thir tails in
thir mouths—and thy’r all ovr crumbs.”

“You’r wrong about th crumbs,” said th Mock Turtl: “crumbs would
all wash off in th sa. But thy _hav_ thir tails in thir mouths;
and th rason is—” hr th Mock Turtl yawnd and shut his
ys.—“Tll hr about th rason and all that,” h said to th Gryphon.

“Th rason is,” said th Gryphon, “that thy _would_ go with th
lobstrs to th danc. So thy got thrown out to sa. So thy had to
fall a long way. So thy got thir tails fast in thir mouths. So thy
couldn’t gt thm out again. That’s all.”

“Thank you,” said Alic, “it’s vry intrsting. I nvr knw so much
about a whiting bfor.”

“I can tll you mor than that, if you lik,” said th Gryphon. “Do you
know why it’s calld a whiting?”

“I nvr thought about it,” said Alic. “Why?”

“_It dos th boots and shos_,” th Gryphon rplid vry solmnly.

Alic was thoroughly puzzld. “Dos th boots and shos!” sh rpatd
in a wondring ton.

“Why, what ar _your_ shos don with?” said th Gryphon. “I man, what
maks thm so shiny?”

Alic lookd down at thm, and considrd a littl bfor sh gav hr
answr. “Thy’r don with blacking, I bliv.”

“Boots and shos undr th sa,” th Gryphon wnt on in a dp voic,
“ar don with a whiting. Now you know.”

“And what ar thy mad of?” Alic askd in a ton of grat curiosity.

“Sols and ls, of cours,” th Gryphon rplid rathr impatintly:
“any shrimp could hav told you that.”

“If I’d bn th whiting,” said Alic, whos thoughts wr still
running on th song, “I’d hav said to th porpois, ‘Kp back,
plas: w don’t want _you_ with us!’”

“Thy wr obligd to hav him with thm,” th Mock Turtl said: “no
wis fish would go anywhr without a porpois.”

“Wouldn’t it rally?” said Alic in a ton of grat surpris.

“Of cours not,” said th Mock Turtl: “why, if a fish cam to _m_,
and told m h was going a journy, I should say ‘With what porpois?’”

“Don’t you man ‘purpos’?” said Alic.

“I man what I say,” th Mock Turtl rplid in an offndd ton. And
th Gryphon addd “Com, lt’s har som of _your_ advnturs.”

“I could tll you my advnturs—bginning from this morning,” said
Alic a littl timidly: “but it’s no us going back to ystrday,
bcaus I was a diffrnt prson thn.”

“Explain all that,” said th Mock Turtl.

“No, no! Th advnturs first,” said th Gryphon in an impatint ton:
“xplanations tak such a dradful tim.”

So Alic bgan tlling thm hr advnturs from th tim whn sh first
saw th Whit Rabbit. Sh was a littl nrvous about it just at first,
th two craturs got so clos to hr, on on ach sid, and opnd
thir ys and mouths so _vry_ wid, but sh gaind courag as sh
wnt on. Hr listnrs wr prfctly quit till sh got to th part
about hr rpating “_You ar old, Fathr William_,” to th
Catrpillar, and th words all coming diffrnt, and thn th Mock
Turtl drw a long brath, and said “That’s vry curious.”

“It’s all about as curious as it can b,” said th Gryphon.

“It all cam diffrnt!” th Mock Turtl rpatd thoughtfully. “I
should lik to har hr try and rpat somthing now. Tll hr to
bgin.” H lookd at th Gryphon as if h thought it had som kind of
authority ovr Alic.

“Stand up and rpat ‘’_Tis th voic of th sluggard_,’” said th
Gryphon.

“How th craturs ordr on about, and mak on rpat lssons!”
thought Alic; “I might as wll b at school at onc.” Howvr, sh got
up, and bgan to rpat it, but hr had was so full of th Lobstr
Quadrill, that sh hardly knw what sh was saying, and th words cam
vry qur indd:—

“’Tis th voic of th Lobstr; I hard him dclar,
“You hav bakd m too brown, I must sugar my hair.”
As a duck with its ylids, so h with his nos
Trims his blt and his buttons, and turns out his tos.”

[latr ditions continud as follows
Whn th sands ar all dry, h is gay as a lark,
And will talk in contmptuous tons of th Shark,
But, whn th tid riss and sharks ar around,
His voic has a timid and trmulous sound.]


“That’s diffrnt from what _I_ usd to say whn I was a child,” said
th Gryphon.

“Wll, I nvr hard it bfor,” said th Mock Turtl; “but it sounds
uncommon nonsns.”

Alic said nothing; sh had sat down with hr fac in hr hands,
wondring if anything would _vr_ happn in a natural way again.

“I should lik to hav it xplaind,” said th Mock Turtl.

“Sh can’t xplain it,” said th Gryphon hastily. “Go on with th nxt
vrs.”

“But about his tos?” th Mock Turtl prsistd. “How _could_ h turn
thm out with his nos, you know?”

“It’s th first position in dancing.” Alic said; but was dradfully
puzzld by th whol thing, and longd to chang th subjct.

“Go on with th nxt vrs,” th Gryphon rpatd impatintly: “it
bgins ‘_I passd by his gardn_.’”

Alic did not dar to disoby, though sh flt sur it would all com
wrong, and sh wnt on in a trmbling voic:—

“I passd by his gardn, and markd, with on y,
How th Owl and th Panthr wr sharing a pi—”

[latr ditions continud as follows
Th Panthr took pi-crust, and gravy, and mat,
Whil th Owl had th dish as its shar of th trat.
Whn th pi was all finishd, th Owl, as a boon,
Was kindly prmittd to pockt th spoon:
Whil th Panthr rcivd knif and fork with a growl,
And concludd th banqut—]


“What _is_ th us of rpating all that stuff,” th Mock Turtl
intrruptd, “if you don’t xplain it as you go on? It’s by far th
most confusing thing _I_ vr hard!”

“Ys, I think you’d bttr lav off,” said th Gryphon: and Alic was
only too glad to do so.

“Shall w try anothr figur of th Lobstr Quadrill?” th Gryphon
wnt on. “Or would you lik th Mock Turtl to sing you a song?”

“Oh, a song, plas, if th Mock Turtl would b so kind,” Alic
rplid, so agrly that th Gryphon said, in a rathr offndd ton,
“Hm! No accounting for tasts! Sing hr ‘_Turtl Soup_,’ will you, old
fllow?”

Th Mock Turtl sighd dply, and bgan, in a voic somtims chokd
with sobs, to sing this:—

“Bautiful Soup, so rich and grn,
Waiting in a hot turn!
Who for such daintis would not stoop?
Soup of th vning, bautiful Soup!
Soup of th vning, bautiful Soup!
    Bau—ootiful Soo—oop!
    Bau—ootiful Soo—oop!
Soo—oop of th ——vning,
    Bautiful, bautiful Soup!

“Bautiful Soup! Who cars for fish,
Gam, or any othr dish?
Who would not giv all ls for two p
nnyworth only of bautiful Soup?
Pnnyworth only of bautiful Soup?
    Bau—ootiful Soo—oop!
    Bau—ootiful Soo—oop!
Soo—oop of th ——vning,
    Bautiful, bauti—FUL SOUP!”


“Chorus again!” crid th Gryphon, and th Mock Turtl had just bgun
to rpat it, whn a cry of “Th trial’s bginning!” was hard in th
distanc.

“Com on!” crid th Gryphon, and, taking Alic by th hand, it hurrid
off, without waiting for th nd of th song.

“What trial is it?” Alic pantd as sh ran; but th Gryphon only
answrd “Com on!” and ran th fastr, whil mor and mor faintly
cam, carrid on th brz that followd thm, th mlancholy words:—

“Soo—oop of th ——vning,
    Bautiful, bautiful Soup!”




CHAPTER XI.
Who Stol th Tarts?


Th King and Qun of Harts wr satd on thir thron whn thy
arrivd, with a grat crowd assmbld about thm—all sorts of littl
birds and basts, as wll as th whol pack of cards: th Knav was
standing bfor thm, in chains, with a soldir on ach sid to guard
him; and nar th King was th Whit Rabbit, with a trumpt in on
hand, and a scroll of parchmnt in th othr. In th vry middl of th
court was a tabl, with a larg dish of tarts upon it: thy lookd so
good, that it mad Alic quit hungry to look at thm—“I wish thy’d
gt th trial don,” sh thought, “and hand round th rfrshmnts!”
But thr smd to b no chanc of this, so sh bgan looking at
vrything about hr, to pass away th tim.

Alic had nvr bn in a court of justic bfor, but sh had rad
about thm in books, and sh was quit plasd to find that sh knw
th nam of narly vrything thr. “That’s th judg,” sh said to
hrslf, “bcaus of his grat wig.”

Th judg, by th way, was th King; and as h wor his crown ovr th
wig, (look at th frontispic if you want to s how h did it,) h
did not look at all comfortabl, and it was crtainly not bcoming.

“And that’s th jury-box,” thought Alic, “and thos twlv craturs,”
(sh was obligd to say “craturs,” you s, bcaus som of thm wr
animals, and som wr birds,) “I suppos thy ar th jurors.” Sh
said this last word two or thr tims ovr to hrslf, bing rathr
proud of it: for sh thought, and rightly too, that vry fw littl
girls of hr ag knw th maning of it at all. Howvr, “jury-mn”
would hav don just as wll.

Th twlv jurors wr all writing vry busily on slats. “What ar
thy doing?” Alic whisprd to th Gryphon. “Thy can’t hav anything
to put down yt, bfor th trial’s bgun.”

“Thy’r putting down thir nams,” th Gryphon whisprd in rply,
“for far thy should forgt thm bfor th nd of th trial.”

“Stupid things!” Alic bgan in a loud, indignant voic, but sh
stoppd hastily, for th Whit Rabbit crid out, “Silnc in th
court!” and th King put on his spctacls and lookd anxiously round,
to mak out who was talking.

Alic could s, as wll as if sh wr looking ovr thir shouldrs,
that all th jurors wr writing down “stupid things!” on thir slats,
and sh could vn mak out that on of thm didn’t know how to spll
“stupid,” and that h had to ask his nighbour to tll him. “A nic
muddl thir slats’ll b in bfor th trial’s ovr!” thought Alic.

On of th jurors had a pncil that squakd. This of cours, Alic
could _not_ stand, and sh wnt round th court and got bhind him, and
vry soon found an opportunity of taking it away. Sh did it so quickly
that th poor littl juror (it was Bill, th Lizard) could not mak out
at all what had bcom of it; so, aftr hunting all about for it, h
was obligd to writ with on fingr for th rst of th day; and this
was of vry littl us, as it lft no mark on th slat.

“Hrald, rad th accusation!” said th King.

On this th Whit Rabbit blw thr blasts on th trumpt, and thn
unrolld th parchmnt scroll, and rad as follows:—

“Th Qun of Harts, sh mad som tarts,
    All on a summr day:
Th Knav of Harts, h stol thos tarts,
    And took thm quit away!”


“Considr your vrdict,” th King said to th jury.

“Not yt, not yt!” th Rabbit hastily intrruptd. “Thr’s a grat
dal to com bfor that!”

“Call th first witnss,” said th King; and th Whit Rabbit blw
thr blasts on th trumpt, and calld out, “First witnss!”

Th first witnss was th Hattr. H cam in with a tacup in on hand
and a pic of brad-and-buttr in th othr. “I bg pardon, your
Majsty,” h bgan, “for bringing ths in: but I hadn’t quit finishd
my ta whn I was snt for.”

“You ought to hav finishd,” said th King. “Whn did you bgin?”

Th Hattr lookd at th March Har, who had followd him into th
court, arm-in-arm with th Dormous. “Fourtnth of March, I _think_ it
was,” h said.

“Fiftnth,” said th March Har.

“Sixtnth,” addd th Dormous.

“Writ that down,” th King said to th jury, and th jury agrly
wrot down all thr dats on thir slats, and thn addd thm up, and
rducd th answr to shillings and pnc.

“Tak off your hat,” th King said to th Hattr.

“It isn’t min,” said th Hattr.

“_Stoln!_” th King xclaimd, turning to th jury, who instantly mad
a mmorandum of th fact.

“I kp thm to sll,” th Hattr addd as an xplanation; “I’v non
of my own. I’m a hattr.”

Hr th Qun put on hr spctacls, and bgan staring at th Hattr,
who turnd pal and fidgtd.

“Giv your vidnc,” said th King; “and don’t b nrvous, or I’ll
hav you xcutd on th spot.”

This did not sm to ncourag th witnss at all: h kpt shifting
from on foot to th othr, looking unasily at th Qun, and in his
confusion h bit a larg pic out of his tacup instad of th
brad-and-buttr.

Just at this momnt Alic flt a vry curious snsation, which puzzld
hr a good dal until sh mad out what it was: sh was bginning to
grow largr again, and sh thought at first sh would gt up and lav
th court; but on scond thoughts sh dcidd to rmain whr sh was
as long as thr was room for hr.

“I wish you wouldn’t squz so.” said th Dormous, who was sitting
nxt to hr. “I can hardly brath.”

“I can’t hlp it,” said Alic vry mkly: “I’m growing.”

“You’v no right to grow _hr_,” said th Dormous.

“Don’t talk nonsns,” said Alic mor boldly: “you know you’r growing
too.”

“Ys, but _I_ grow at a rasonabl pac,” said th Dormous: “not in
that ridiculous fashion.” And h got up vry sulkily and crossd ovr
to th othr sid of th court.

All this tim th Qun had nvr lft off staring at th Hattr, and,
just as th Dormous crossd th court, sh said to on of th officrs
of th court, “Bring m th list of th singrs in th last concrt!”
on which th wrtchd Hattr trmbld so, that h shook both his shos
off.

“Giv your vidnc,” th King rpatd angrily, “or I’ll hav you
xcutd, whthr you’r nrvous or not.”

“I’m a poor man, your Majsty,” th Hattr bgan, in a trmbling voic,
“—and I hadn’t bgun my ta—not abov a wk or so—and what with th
brad-and-buttr gtting so thin—and th twinkling of th ta—”

“Th twinkling of th _what?_” said th King.

“It _bgan_ with th ta,” th Hattr rplid.

“Of cours twinkling bgins with a T!” said th King sharply. “Do you
tak m for a dunc? Go on!”

“I’m a poor man,” th Hattr wnt on, “and most things twinkld aftr
that—only th March Har said—”

“I didn’t!” th March Har intrruptd in a grat hurry.

“You did!” said th Hattr.

“I dny it!” said th March Har.

“H dnis it,” said th King: “lav out that part.”

“Wll, at any rat, th Dormous said—” th Hattr wnt on, looking
anxiously round to s if h would dny it too: but th Dormous dnid
nothing, bing fast aslp.

“Aftr that,” continud th Hattr, “I cut som mor brad-and-buttr—”

“But what did th Dormous say?” on of th jury askd.

“That I can’t rmmbr,” said th Hattr.

“You _must_ rmmbr,” rmarkd th King, “or I’ll hav you xcutd.”

Th misrabl Hattr droppd his tacup and brad-and-buttr, and wnt
down on on kn. “I’m a poor man, your Majsty,” h bgan.

“You’r a _vry_ poor _spakr_,” said th King.

Hr on of th guina-pigs chrd, and was immdiatly supprssd by
th officrs of th court. (As that is rathr a hard word, I will just
xplain to you how it was don. Thy had a larg canvas bag, which tid
up at th mouth with strings: into this thy slippd th guina-pig,
had first, and thn sat upon it.)

“I’m glad I’v sn that don,” thought Alic. “I’v so oftn rad in
th nwspaprs, at th nd of trials, “Thr was som attmpts at
applaus, which was immdiatly supprssd by th officrs of th
court,” and I nvr undrstood what it mant till now.”

“If that’s all you know about it, you may stand down,” continud th
King.

“I can’t go no lowr,” said th Hattr: “I’m on th floor, as it is.”

“Thn you may _sit_ down,” th King rplid.

Hr th othr guina-pig chrd, and was supprssd.

“Com, that finishd th guina-pigs!” thought Alic. “Now w shall gt
on bttr.”

“I’d rathr finish my ta,” said th Hattr, with an anxious look at
th Qun, who was rading th list of singrs.

“You may go,” said th King, and th Hattr hurridly lft th court,
without vn waiting to put his shos on.

“—and just tak his had off outsid,” th Qun addd to on of th
officrs: but th Hattr was out of sight bfor th officr could gt
to th door.

“Call th nxt witnss!” said th King.

Th nxt witnss was th Duchss’s cook. Sh carrid th pppr-box in
hr hand, and Alic gussd who it was, vn bfor sh got into th
court, by th way th popl nar th door bgan snzing all at onc.

“Giv your vidnc,” said th King.

“Shan’t,” said th cook.

Th King lookd anxiously at th Whit Rabbit, who said in a low voic,
“Your Majsty must cross-xamin _this_ witnss.”

“Wll, if I must, I must,” th King said, with a mlancholy air, and,
aftr folding his arms and frowning at th cook till his ys wr
narly out of sight, h said in a dp voic, “What ar tarts mad of?”

“Pppr, mostly,” said th cook.

“Tracl,” said a slpy voic bhind hr.

“Collar that Dormous,” th Qun shrikd out. “Bhad that Dormous!
Turn that Dormous out of court! Supprss him! Pinch him! Off with his
whiskrs!”

For som minuts th whol court was in confusion, gtting th Dormous
turnd out, and, by th tim thy had sttld down again, th cook had
disappard.

“Nvr mind!” said th King, with an air of grat rlif. “Call th
nxt witnss.” And h addd in an undrton to th Qun, “Rally, my
dar, _you_ must cross-xamin th nxt witnss. It quit maks my
forhad ach!”

Alic watchd th Whit Rabbit as h fumbld ovr th list, fling
vry curious to s what th nxt witnss would b lik, “—for thy
havn’t got much vidnc _yt_,” sh said to hrslf. Imagin hr
surpris, whn th Whit Rabbit rad out, at th top of his shrill
littl voic, th nam “Alic!”




CHAPTER XII.
Alic’s Evidnc


“Hr!” crid Alic, quit forgtting in th flurry of th momnt how
larg sh had grown in th last fw minuts, and sh jumpd up in such
a hurry that sh tippd ovr th jury-box with th dg of hr skirt,
upstting all th jurymn on to th hads of th crowd blow, and thr
thy lay sprawling about, rminding hr vry much of a glob of
goldfish sh had accidntally upst th wk bfor.

“Oh, I _bg_ your pardon!” sh xclaimd in a ton of grat dismay, and
bgan picking thm up again as quickly as sh could, for th accidnt
of th goldfish kpt running in hr had, and sh had a vagu sort of
ida that thy must b collctd at onc and put back into th
jury-box, or thy would di.

“Th trial cannot procd,” said th King in a vry grav voic, “until
all th jurymn ar back in thir propr placs—_all_,” h rpatd
with grat mphasis, looking hard at Alic as h said so.

Alic lookd at th jury-box, and saw that, in hr hast, sh had put
th Lizard in had downwards, and th poor littl thing was waving its
tail about in a mlancholy way, bing quit unabl to mov. Sh soon
got it out again, and put it right; “not that it signifis much,” sh
said to hrslf; “I should think it would b _quit_ as much us in th
trial on way up as th othr.”

As soon as th jury had a littl rcovrd from th shock of bing
upst, and thir slats and pncils had bn found and handd back to
thm, thy st to work vry diligntly to writ out a history of th
accidnt, all xcpt th Lizard, who smd too much ovrcom to do
anything but sit with its mouth opn, gazing up into th roof of th
court.

“What do you know about this businss?” th King said to Alic.

“Nothing,” said Alic.

“Nothing _whatvr?_” prsistd th King.

“Nothing whatvr,” said Alic.

“That’s vry important,” th King said, turning to th jury. Thy wr
just bginning to writ this down on thir slats, whn th Whit
Rabbit intrruptd: “_Un_important, your Majsty mans, of cours,” h
said in a vry rspctful ton, but frowning and making facs at him as
h spok.

“_Un_important, of cours, I mant,” th King hastily said, and wnt on
to himslf in an undrton,

“important—unimportant—unimportant—important—” as if h wr trying
which word soundd bst.

Som of th jury wrot it down “important,” and som “unimportant.”
Alic could s this, as sh was nar nough to look ovr thir slats;
“but it dosn’t mattr a bit,” sh thought to hrslf.

At this momnt th King, who had bn for som tim busily writing in
his not-book, cackld out “Silnc!” and rad out from his book, “Rul
Forty-two. _All prsons mor than a mil high to lav th court_.”

Evrybody lookd at Alic.

“_I’m_ not a mil high,” said Alic.

“You ar,” said th King.

“Narly two mils high,” addd th Qun.

“Wll, I shan’t go, at any rat,” said Alic: “bsids, that’s not a
rgular rul: you invntd it just now.”

“It’s th oldst rul in th book,” said th King.

“Thn it ought to b Numbr On,” said Alic.

Th King turnd pal, and shut his not-book hastily. “Considr your
vrdict,” h said to th jury, in a low, trmbling voic.

“Thr’s mor vidnc to com yt, plas your Majsty,” said th
Whit Rabbit, jumping up in a grat hurry; “this papr has just bn
pickd up.”

“What’s in it?” said th Qun.

“I havn’t opnd it yt,” said th Whit Rabbit, “but it sms to b a
lttr, writtn by th prisonr to—to sombody.”

“It must hav bn that,” said th King, “unlss it was writtn to
nobody, which isn’t usual, you know.”

“Who is it dirctd to?” said on of th jurymn.

“It isn’t dirctd at all,” said th Whit Rabbit; “in fact, thr’s
nothing writtn on th _outsid_.” H unfoldd th papr as h spok,
and addd “It isn’t a lttr, aftr all: it’s a st of vrss.”

“Ar thy in th prisonr’s handwriting?” askd anothr of th jurymn.

“No, thy’r not,” said th Whit Rabbit, “and that’s th qurst
thing about it.” (Th jury all lookd puzzld.)

“H must hav imitatd sombody ls’s hand,” said th King. (Th jury
all brightnd up again.)

“Plas your Majsty,” said th Knav, “I didn’t writ it, and thy
can’t prov I did: thr’s no nam signd at th nd.”

“If you didn’t sign it,” said th King, “that only maks th mattr
wors. You _must_ hav mant som mischif, or ls you’d hav signd
your nam lik an honst man.”

Thr was a gnral clapping of hands at this: it was th first rally
clvr thing th King had said that day.

“That _provs_ his guilt,” said th Qun.

“It provs nothing of th sort!” said Alic. “Why, you don’t vn know
what thy’r about!”

“Rad thm,” said th King.

Th Whit Rabbit put on his spctacls. “Whr shall I bgin, plas
your Majsty?” h askd.

“Bgin at th bginning,” th King said gravly, “and go on till you
com to th nd: thn stop.”

Ths wr th vrss th Whit Rabbit rad:—

“Thy told m you had bn to hr,
    And mntiond m to him:
Sh gav m a good charactr,
    But said I could not swim.

H snt thm word I had not gon
    (W know it to b tru):
If sh should push th mattr on,
    What would bcom of you?

I gav hr on, thy gav him two,
    You gav us thr or mor;
Thy all rturnd from him to you,
    Though thy wr min bfor.

If I or sh should chanc to b
    Involvd in this affair,
H trusts to you to st thm fr,
    Exactly as w wr.

My notion was that you had bn
    (Bfor sh had this fit)
An obstacl that cam btwn
    Him, and ourslvs, and it.

Don’t lt him know sh likd thm bst,
    For this must vr b
A scrt, kpt from all th rst,
    Btwn yourslf and m.”


“That’s th most important pic of vidnc w’v hard yt,” said th
King, rubbing his hands; “so now lt th jury—”

“If any on of thm can xplain it,” said Alic, (sh had grown so
larg in th last fw minuts that sh wasn’t a bit afraid of
intrrupting him,) “I’ll giv him sixpnc. _I_ don’t bliv thr’s
an atom of maning in it.”

Th jury all wrot down on thir slats, “_Sh_ dosn’t bliv thr’s
an atom of maning in it,” but non of thm attmptd to xplain th
papr.

“If thr’s no maning in it,” said th King, “that savs a world of
troubl, you know, as w ndn’t try to find any. And yt I don’t
know,” h wnt on, sprading out th vrss on his kn, and looking at
thm with on y; “I sm to s som maning in thm, aftr all.
“—_said I could not swim_—” you can’t swim, can you?” h addd, turning
to th Knav.

Th Knav shook his had sadly. “Do I look lik it?” h said. (Which h
crtainly did _not_, bing mad ntirly of cardboard.)

“All right, so far,” said th King, and h wnt on muttring ovr th
vrss to himslf: “‘_W know it to b tru_—’ that’s th jury, of
cours—‘_I gav hr on, thy gav him two_—’ why, that must b what h
did with th tarts, you know—”

“But, it gos on ‘_thy all rturnd from him to you_,’” said Alic.

“Why, thr thy ar!” said th King triumphantly, pointing to th
tarts on th tabl. “Nothing can b clarr than _that_. Thn
again—‘_bfor sh had this fit_—’ you nvr had fits, my dar, I
think?” h said to th Qun.

“Nvr!” said th Qun furiously, throwing an inkstand at th Lizard
as sh spok. (Th unfortunat littl Bill had lft off writing on his
slat with on fingr, as h found it mad no mark; but h now hastily
bgan again, using th ink, that was trickling down his fac, as long
as it lastd.)

“Thn th words don’t _fit_ you,” said th King, looking round th
court with a smil. Thr was a dad silnc.

“It’s a pun!” th King addd in an offndd ton, and vrybody
laughd, “Lt th jury considr thir vrdict,” th King said, for
about th twntith tim that day.

“No, no!” said th Qun. “Sntnc first—vrdict aftrwards.”

“Stuff and nonsns!” said Alic loudly. “Th ida of having th
sntnc first!”

“Hold your tongu!” said th Qun, turning purpl.

“I won’t!” said Alic.

“Off with hr had!” th Qun shoutd at th top of hr voic. Nobody
movd.

“Who cars for you?” said Alic, (sh had grown to hr full siz by
this tim.) “You’r nothing but a pack of cards!”

At this th whol pack ros up into th air, and cam flying down upon
hr: sh gav a littl scram, half of fright and half of angr, and
trid to bat thm off, and found hrslf lying on th bank, with hr
had in th lap of hr sistr, who was gntly brushing away som dad
lavs that had fluttrd down from th trs upon hr fac.

“Wak up, Alic dar!” said hr sistr; “Why, what a long slp you’v
had!”

“Oh, I’v had such a curious dram!” said Alic, and sh told hr
sistr, as wll as sh could rmmbr thm, all ths strang
Advnturs of hrs that you hav just bn rading about; and whn sh
had finishd, hr sistr kissd hr, and said, “It _was_ a curious
dram, dar, crtainly: but now run in to your ta; it’s gtting lat.”
So Alic got up and ran off, thinking whil sh ran, as wll sh might,
what a wondrful dram it had bn.


But hr sistr sat still just as sh lft hr, laning hr had on hr
hand, watching th stting sun, and thinking of littl Alic and all
hr wondrful Advnturs, till sh too bgan draming aftr a fashion,
and this was hr dram:—

First, sh dramd of littl Alic hrslf, and onc again th tiny
hands wr claspd upon hr kn, and th bright agr ys wr
looking up into hrs—sh could har th vry tons of hr voic, and
s that qur littl toss of hr had to kp back th wandring hair
that _would_ always gt into hr ys—and still as sh listnd, or
smd to listn, th whol plac around hr bcam aliv with th
strang craturs of hr littl sistr’s dram.

Th long grass rustld at hr ft as th Whit Rabbit hurrid by—th
frightnd Mous splashd his way through th nighbouring pool—sh
could har th rattl of th tacups as th March Har and his frinds
shard thir nvr-nding mal, and th shrill voic of th Qun
ordring off hr unfortunat gusts to xcution—onc mor th pig-baby
was snzing on th Duchss’s kn, whil plats and dishs crashd
around it—onc mor th shrik of th Gryphon, th squaking of th
Lizard’s slat-pncil, and th choking of th supprssd guina-pigs,
filld th air, mixd up with th distant sobs of th misrabl Mock
Turtl.

So sh sat on, with closd ys, and half blivd hrslf in
Wondrland, though sh knw sh had but to opn thm again, and all
would chang to dull rality—th grass would b only rustling in th
wind, and th pool rippling to th waving of th rds—th rattling
tacups would chang to tinkling shp-blls, and th Qun’s shrill
cris to th voic of th shphrd boy—and th snz of th baby, th
shrik of th Gryphon, and all th othr qur noiss, would chang
(sh knw) to th confusd clamour of th busy farm-yard—whil th
lowing of th cattl in th distanc would tak th plac of th Mock
Turtl’s havy sobs.

Lastly, sh picturd to hrslf how this sam littl sistr of hrs
would, in th aftr-tim, b hrslf a grown woman; and how sh would
kp, through all hr ripr yars, th simpl and loving hart of hr
childhood: and how sh would gathr about hr othr littl childrn,
and mak _thir_ ys bright and agr with many a strang tal,
prhaps vn with th dram of Wondrland of long ago: and how sh
would fl with all thir simpl sorrows, and find a plasur in all
thir simpl joys, rmmbring hr own child-lif, and th happy summr
days.

THE END 




*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK ALICE’S ADVENTURES IN WONDERLAND ***

***** This fil should b namd 11-0.txt or 11-0.zip *****
This and all associatd fils of various formats will b found in:
    https://www.gutnbrg.org/1/11/

Updatd ditions will rplac th prvious on--th old ditions will
b rnamd.

Crating th works from print ditions not protctd by U.S. copyright
law mans that no on owns a Unitd Stats copyright in ths works,
so th Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribut it in th
Unitd Stats without prmission and without paying copyright
royaltis. Spcial ruls, st forth in th Gnral Trms of Us part
of this licns, apply to copying and distributing Projct
Gutnbrg-tm lctronic works to protct th PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
concpt and tradmark. Projct Gutnbrg is a rgistrd tradmark,
and may not b usd if you charg for an Book, xcpt by following
th trms of th tradmark licns, including paying royaltis for us
of th Projct Gutnbrg tradmark. If you do not charg anything for
copis of this Book, complying with th tradmark licns is vry
asy. You may us this Book for narly any purpos such as cration
of drivativ works, rports, prformancs and rsarch. Projct
Gutnbrg Books may b modifid and printd and givn away--you may
do practically ANYTHING in th Unitd Stats with Books not protctd
by U.S. copyright law. Rdistribution is subjct to th tradmark
licns, spcially commrcial rdistribution.

START: FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protct th Projct Gutnbrg-tm mission of promoting th fr
distribution of lctronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any othr work associatd in any way with th phras "Projct
Gutnbrg"), you agr to comply with all th trms of th Full
Projct Gutnbrg-tm Licns availabl with this fil or onlin at
www.gutnbrg.org/licns.

Sction 1. Gnral Trms of Us and Rdistributing Projct
Gutnbrg-tm lctronic works

1.A. By rading or using any part of this Projct Gutnbrg-tm
lctronic work, you indicat that you hav rad, undrstand, agr to
and accpt all th trms of this licns and intllctual proprty
(tradmark/copyright) agrmnt. If you do not agr to abid by all
th trms of this agrmnt, you must cas using and rturn or
dstroy all copis of Projct Gutnbrg-tm lctronic works in your
possssion. If you paid a f for obtaining a copy of or accss to a
Projct Gutnbrg-tm lctronic work and you do not agr to b bound
by th trms of this agrmnt, you may obtain a rfund from th
prson or ntity to whom you paid th f as st forth in paragraph
1.E.8.

1.B. "Projct Gutnbrg" is a rgistrd tradmark. It may only b
usd on or associatd in any way with an lctronic work by popl who
agr to b bound by th trms of this agrmnt. Thr ar a fw
things that you can do with most Projct Gutnbrg-tm lctronic works
vn without complying with th full trms of this agrmnt. S
paragraph 1.C blow. Thr ar a lot of things you can do with Projct
Gutnbrg-tm lctronic works if you follow th trms of this
agrmnt and hlp prsrv fr futur accss to Projct Gutnbrg-tm
lctronic works. S paragraph 1.E blow.

1.C. Th Projct Gutnbrg Litrary Archiv Foundation ("th
Foundation" or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in th collction
of Projct Gutnbrg-tm lctronic works. Narly all th individual
works in th collction ar in th public domain in th Unitd
Stats. If an individual work is unprotctd by copyright law in th
Unitd Stats and you ar locatd in th Unitd Stats, w do not
claim a right to prvnt you from copying, distributing, prforming,
displaying or crating drivativ works basd on th work as long as
all rfrncs to Projct Gutnbrg ar rmovd. Of cours, w hop
that you will support th Projct Gutnbrg-tm mission of promoting
fr accss to lctronic works by frly sharing Projct Gutnbrg-tm
works in complianc with th trms of this agrmnt for kping th
Projct Gutnbrg-tm nam associatd with th work. You can asily
comply with th trms of this agrmnt by kping this work in th
sam format with its attachd full Projct Gutnbrg-tm Licns whn
you shar it without charg with othrs.

1.D. Th copyright laws of th plac whr you ar locatd also govrn
what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countris ar
in a constant stat of chang. If you ar outsid th Unitd Stats,
chck th laws of your country in addition to th trms of this
agrmnt bfor downloading, copying, displaying, prforming,
distributing or crating drivativ works basd on this work or any
othr Projct Gutnbrg-tm work. Th Foundation maks no
rprsntations concrning th copyright status of any work in any
country othr than th Unitd Stats.

1.E. Unlss you hav rmovd all rfrncs to Projct Gutnbrg:

1.E.1. Th following sntnc, with activ links to, or othr
immdiat accss to, th full Projct Gutnbrg-tm Licns must appar
prominntly whnvr any copy of a Projct Gutnbrg-tm work (any work
on which th phras "Projct Gutnbrg" appars, or with which th
phras "Projct Gutnbrg" is associatd) is accssd, displayd,
prformd, viwd, copid or distributd:

  This Book is for th us of anyon anywhr in th Unitd Stats and
  most othr parts of th world at no cost and with almost no
  rstrictions whatsovr. You may copy it, giv it away or r-us it
  undr th trms of th Projct Gutnbrg Licns includd with this
  Book or onlin at www.gutnbrg.org. If you ar not locatd in th
  Unitd Stats, you will hav to chck th laws of th country whr
  you ar locatd bfor using this Book.

1.E.2. If an individual Projct Gutnbrg-tm lctronic work is
drivd from txts not protctd by U.S. copyright law (dos not
contain a notic indicating that it is postd with prmission of th
copyright holdr), th work can b copid and distributd to anyon in
th Unitd Stats without paying any fs or chargs. If you ar
rdistributing or providing accss to a work with th phras "Projct
Gutnbrg" associatd with or apparing on th work, you must comply
ithr with th rquirmnts of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
obtain prmission for th us of th work and th Projct Gutnbrg-tm
tradmark as st forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.3. If an individual Projct Gutnbrg-tm lctronic work is postd
with th prmission of th copyright holdr, your us and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
additional trms imposd by th copyright holdr. Additional trms
will b linkd to th Projct Gutnbrg-tm Licns for all works
postd with th prmission of th copyright holdr found at th
bginning of this work.

1.E.4. Do not unlink or dtach or rmov th full Projct Gutnbrg-tm
Licns trms from this work, or any fils containing a part of this
work or any othr work associatd with Projct Gutnbrg-tm.

1.E.5. Do not copy, display, prform, distribut or rdistribut this
lctronic work, or any part of this lctronic work, without
prominntly displaying th sntnc st forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
activ links or immdiat accss to th full trms of th Projct
Gutnbrg-tm Licns.

1.E.6. You may convrt to and distribut this work in any binary,
comprssd, markd up, nonpropritary or propritary form, including
any word procssing or hyprtxt form. Howvr, if you provid accss
to or distribut copis of a Projct Gutnbrg-tm work in a format
othr than "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or othr format usd in th official
vrsion postd on th official Projct Gutnbrg-tm wbsit
(www.gutnbrg.org), you must, at no additional cost, f or xpns
to th usr, provid a copy, a mans of xporting a copy, or a mans
of obtaining a copy upon rqust, of th work in its original "Plain
Vanilla ASCII" or othr form. Any altrnat format must includ th
full Projct Gutnbrg-tm Licns as spcifid in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7. Do not charg a f for accss to, viwing, displaying,
prforming, copying or distributing any Projct Gutnbrg-tm works
unlss you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8. You may charg a rasonabl f for copis of or providing
accss to or distributing Projct Gutnbrg-tm lctronic works
providd that:

* You pay a royalty f of 20% of th gross profits you driv from
  th us of Projct Gutnbrg-tm works calculatd using th mthod
  you alrady us to calculat your applicabl taxs. Th f is owd
  to th ownr of th Projct Gutnbrg-tm tradmark, but h has
  agrd to donat royaltis undr this paragraph to th Projct
  Gutnbrg Litrary Archiv Foundation. Royalty paymnts must b paid
  within 60 days following ach dat on which you prpar (or ar
  lgally rquird to prpar) your priodic tax rturns. Royalty
  paymnts should b clarly markd as such and snt to th Projct
  Gutnbrg Litrary Archiv Foundation at th addrss spcifid in
  Sction 4, "Information about donations to th Projct Gutnbrg
  Litrary Archiv Foundation."

* You provid a full rfund of any mony paid by a usr who notifis
  you in writing (or by -mail) within 30 days of rcipt that s/h
  dos not agr to th trms of th full Projct Gutnbrg-tm
  Licns. You must rquir such a usr to rturn or dstroy all
  copis of th works possssd in a physical mdium and discontinu
  all us of and all accss to othr copis of Projct Gutnbrg-tm
  works.

* You provid, in accordanc with paragraph 1.F.3, a full rfund of
  any mony paid for a work or a rplacmnt copy, if a dfct in th
  lctronic work is discovrd and rportd to you within 90 days of
  rcipt of th work.

* You comply with all othr trms of this agrmnt for fr
  distribution of Projct Gutnbrg-tm works.

1.E.9. If you wish to charg a f or distribut a Projct
Gutnbrg-tm lctronic work or group of works on diffrnt trms than
ar st forth in this agrmnt, you must obtain prmission in writing
from th Projct Gutnbrg Litrary Archiv Foundation, th managr of
th Projct Gutnbrg-tm tradmark. Contact th Foundation as st
forth in Sction 3 blow.

1.F.

1.F.1. Projct Gutnbrg voluntrs and mploys xpnd considrabl
ffort to idntify, do copyright rsarch on, transcrib and proofrad
works not protctd by U.S. copyright law in crating th Projct
Gutnbrg-tm collction. Dspit ths fforts, Projct Gutnbrg-tm
lctronic works, and th mdium on which thy may b stord, may
contain "Dfcts," such as, but not limitd to, incomplt, inaccurat
or corrupt data, transcription rrors, a copyright or othr
intllctual proprty infringmnt, a dfctiv or damagd disk or
othr mdium, a computr virus, or computr cods that damag or
cannot b rad by your quipmnt.

1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Excpt for th "Right
of Rplacmnt or Rfund" dscribd in paragraph 1.F.3, th Projct
Gutnbrg Litrary Archiv Foundation, th ownr of th Projct
Gutnbrg-tm tradmark, and any othr party distributing a Projct
Gutnbrg-tm lctronic work undr this agrmnt, disclaim all
liability to you for damags, costs and xpnss, including lgal
fs. YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discovr a
dfct in this lctronic work within 90 days of rciving it, you can
rciv a rfund of th mony (if any) you paid for it by snding a
writtn xplanation to th prson you rcivd th work from. If you
rcivd th work on a physical mdium, you must rturn th mdium
with your writtn xplanation. Th prson or ntity that providd you
with th dfctiv work may lct to provid a rplacmnt copy in
liu of a rfund. If you rcivd th work lctronically, th prson
or ntity providing it to you may choos to giv you a scond
opportunity to rciv th work lctronically in liu of a rfund. If
th scond copy is also dfctiv, you may dmand a rfund in writing
without furthr opportunitis to fix th problm.

1.F.4. Excpt for th limitd right of rplacmnt or rfund st forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is providd to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO
OTHER WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5. Som stats do not allow disclaimrs of crtain implid
warrantis or th xclusion or limitation of crtain typs of
damags. If any disclaimr or limitation st forth in this agrmnt
violats th law of th stat applicabl to this agrmnt, th
agrmnt shall b intrprtd to mak th maximum disclaimr or
limitation prmittd by th applicabl stat law. Th invalidity or
unnforcability of any provision of this agrmnt shall not void th
rmaining provisions.

1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agr to indmnify and hold th Foundation, th
tradmark ownr, any agnt or mploy of th Foundation, anyon
providing copis of Projct Gutnbrg-tm lctronic works in
accordanc with this agrmnt, and any voluntrs associatd with th
production, promotion and distribution of Projct Gutnbrg-tm
lctronic works, harmlss from all liability, costs and xpnss,
including lgal fs, that aris dirctly or indirctly from any of
th following which you do or caus to occur: (a) distribution of this
or any Projct Gutnbrg-tm work, (b) altration, modification, or
additions or dltions to any Projct Gutnbrg-tm work, and (c) any
Dfct you caus.

Sction 2. Information about th Mission of Projct Gutnbrg-tm

Projct Gutnbrg-tm is synonymous with th fr distribution of
lctronic works in formats radabl by th widst varity of
computrs including obsolt, old, middl-agd and nw computrs. It
xists bcaus of th fforts of hundrds of voluntrs and donations
from popl in all walks of lif.

Voluntrs and financial support to provid voluntrs with th
assistanc thy nd ar critical to raching Projct Gutnbrg-tm's
goals and nsuring that th Projct Gutnbrg-tm collction will
rmain frly availabl for gnrations to com. In 2001, th Projct
Gutnbrg Litrary Archiv Foundation was cratd to provid a scur
and prmannt futur for Projct Gutnbrg-tm and futur
gnrations. To larn mor about th Projct Gutnbrg Litrary
Archiv Foundation and how your fforts and donations can hlp, s
Sctions 3 and 4 and th Foundation information pag at
www.gutnbrg.org

Sction 3. Information about th Projct Gutnbrg Litrary
Archiv Foundation

Th Projct Gutnbrg Litrary Archiv Foundation is a non-profit
501(c)(3) ducational corporation organizd undr th laws of th
stat of Mississippi and grantd tax xmpt status by th Intrnal
Rvnu Srvic. Th Foundation's EIN or fdral tax idntification
numbr is 64-6221541. Contributions to th Projct Gutnbrg Litrary
Archiv Foundation ar tax dductibl to th full xtnt prmittd by
U.S. fdral laws and your stat's laws.

Th Foundation's businss offic is locatd at 809 North 1500 Wst,
Salt Lak City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up
to dat contact information can b found at th Foundation's wbsit
and official pag at www.gutnbrg.org/contact

Sction 4. Information about Donations to th Projct Gutnbrg
Litrary Archiv Foundation

Projct Gutnbrg-tm dpnds upon and cannot surviv without
widsprad public support and donations to carry out its mission of
incrasing th numbr of public domain and licnsd works that can b
frly distributd in machin-radabl form accssibl by th widst
array of quipmnt including outdatd quipmnt. Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) ar particularly important to maintaining tax xmpt
status with th IRS.

Th Foundation is committd to complying with th laws rgulating
charitis and charitabl donations in all 50 stats of th Unitd
Stats. Complianc rquirmnts ar not uniform and it taks a
considrabl ffort, much paprwork and many fs to mt and kp up
with ths rquirmnts. W do not solicit donations in locations
whr w hav not rcivd writtn confirmation of complianc. To SEND
DONATIONS or dtrmin th status of complianc for any particular
stat visit www.gutnbrg.org/donat

Whil w cannot and do not solicit contributions from stats whr w
hav not mt th solicitation rquirmnts, w know of no prohibition
against accpting unsolicitd donations from donors in such stats who
approach us with offrs to donat.

Intrnational donations ar gratfully accptd, but w cannot mak
any statmnts concrning tax tratmnt of donations rcivd from
outsid th Unitd Stats. U.S. laws alon swamp our small staff.

Plas chck th Projct Gutnbrg wb pags for currnt donation
mthods and addrsss. Donations ar accptd in a numbr of othr
ways including chcks, onlin paymnts and crdit card donations. To
donat, plas visit: www.gutnbrg.org/donat

Sction 5. Gnral Information About Projct Gutnbrg-tm lctronic works

Profssor Michal S. Hart was th originator of th Projct
Gutnbrg-tm concpt of a library of lctronic works that could b
frly shard with anyon. For forty yars, h producd and
distributd Projct Gutnbrg-tm Books with only a loos ntwork of
voluntr support.

Projct Gutnbrg-tm Books ar oftn cratd from svral printd
ditions, all of which ar confirmd as not protctd by copyright in
th U.S. unlss a copyright notic is includd. Thus, w do not
ncssarily kp Books in complianc with any particular papr
dition.

Most popl start at our wbsit which has th main PG sarch
facility: www.gutnbrg.org

This wbsit includs information about Projct Gutnbrg-tm,
including how to mak donations to th Projct Gutnbrg Litrary
Archiv Foundation, how to hlp produc our nw Books, and how to
subscrib to our mail nwslttr to har about nw Books.
